Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:PART IGENERALLYNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 101. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND DECLARATION.The legislature finds that plan 1 of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system (LEOFF plan 1) has been closed to new members for nearly a quarter of a century and is now comprised almost entirely of retirees and survivor beneficiaries. Similarly, employers and employees have made no contributions to the plan for nearly a quarter of a century, and over the life of the plan, over 80 percent of all funds contributed have been from the state through general fundâstate appropriations.As of January 2026, only six active members remain in the plan, as compared to 6,000 annuitants. LEOFF plan 1 has far exceeded full funding and has assets which exceed all projected future liabilities, has a surplus of more than $3,300,000,000 today, and no significant amount of additional benefits can be earned in the plan. By the date most of this act is effective, June 30, 2029, LEOFF plan 1 is projected to reach more than 200 percent of full funding.The supreme court of the state of Washington, in the 1972 decision Weaver v. Evans, established that the firefighters and police officers, active and retired, have a constitutionally protected contractual right to a secure retirement benefit, funded on a systematic basis. The legislature recognizes that the state of Washington is the ultimate guarantor of the LEOFF plan 1 retirement benefits. While members have a constitutionally protected right to the pension benefits that are provided as part of their contract of employment, individual members and beneficiaries do not have a right to assets beyond the amount needed to completely satisfy all liabilities under the plan.As the plan sponsor, the state retains the inherent power to terminate a retirement plan and is entitled, upon the satisfaction of all liabilities under the plan, to a reversion of the surplus assets. The restatement of LEOFF plan 1 shall include the transfer of actuarially sufficient resources to ensure the satisfaction of all liabilities under LEOFF plan 1.The legislature has determined that, in order to accomplish the foregoing goals and objectives, it is in the best interest of the members and beneficiaries of LEOFF plan 1 that the plan be terminated and that a restated retirement plan be created. The legislature recognizes that assets in the LEOFF 1 trust account, including all assets attributable to members and employers, as well as assets attributable to the state that are needed to fully satisfy all liabilities of LEOFF plan 1, are intended for the exclusive benefit of the plan's members and beneficiaries. Thus, only after actuarially sufficient assets have been transferred to the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall there be a reversion of any surplus assets to the state in the interest of the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the state.It is the intent of the legislature that the LEOFF plan 1 restatement and termination be performed in accordance with the provisions of the federal internal revenue code that apply to state government pension plans and in recognition of the contract rights of the members and beneficiaries of the plan to an actuarially sound retirement program. Between the enactment of this law and the restatement and termination of LEOFF plan 1, the legislature intends to make any changes necessary to conform with federal requirements following receipt of formal guidance from the federal internal revenue service.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 102. RESTATEMENT AND TERMINATION.Plan 1 of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system is restated, and hereby terminated, effective June 30, 2029. During the transition between the restatement and termination and the establishment of the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, all benefits, as they existed prior to termination and restatement, shall continue without interruption.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 103. RESTATED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS' AND FIREFIGHTERS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM ESTABLISHED.(1) The restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system is hereby established as provided in this chapter. The restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system established by this chapter may also be referred to by statute and rule as the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1.(2) The restated law enforcement plan does not create benefits for members and beneficiaries different than, nor in addition to, those that existed prior to restatement and termination, with the exception of vesting benefits for nonvested members upon the creation of the restated plan in section 318 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 104. RESTATED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS' AND FIREFIGHTERS' DEFINED BENEFIT RETIREMENT FUND ESTABLISHED.(1) The restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' defined benefit retirement fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The fund shall consist of assets transferred from the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement fund, investment earnings, and other amounts deposited to the fund.(2) Expenditures from the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' defined benefit retirement fund may be used only for the purposes of this chapter. Only the director of retirement systems or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. No appropriation is required for expenditures.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 105. TRANSFERS OF FUNDS.(1) On June 30, 2029, at the direction of the director of retirement systems, the state treasurer shall transfer to the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' defined benefit retirement fund an amount equal to 110 percent of the actuarial present value of the fully projected benefits of plan 1 of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, as identified in subsection (2) of this section.(2)(a) No later than December 31, 2028, the state actuary must determine the actuarial present value of fully projected benefits of plan 1 of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system on June 30, 2029, by projecting the results of the latest actuarial valuation available at the time of determination to June 30, 2029.(b) The pension funding council may solicit and administer an independent actuarial audit of the valuation in this subsection.(3) On June 30, 2029, the state treasurer shall transfer the remaining assets in the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement fund, after the transfer in subsection (1) of this section, into the pension surplus holding account and the remaining assets shall continue to be invested by the state investment board until otherwise directed by law.(4) The director of retirement systems may direct the state treasurer, subsequent to the transfer of assets under this section, to make such additional transfers as are necessary to reconcile the amounts transferred and the requirements of sections 101 through 106 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 106. INVESTMENT OF FUNDS.(1) The state investment board has the full power to invest, reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money in (a) the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' defined benefit retirement fund and (b) the pension surplus holding account. All investment and operating costs of the state investment board and the state treasurer associated with these funds shall be paid under RCW 43.08.190, 43.33A.160, 43.79A.040, and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, the earnings from the investment of the funds shall be retained by the funds.(2) All investments made by the state investment board shall be made with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care under RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policy established by the state investment board.(3) As deemed appropriate by the state investment board, money in the funds may be commingled for investment with other qualified or eligible funds under the investment authority of the board.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 107. RESERVATION OF RIGHTS.The legislature reserves the right to make such amendments and modifications as may be necessary in the future to accomplish the goals of sections 101 through 108 of this act, without any diminution of the rights and benefits of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 members, retirees, and surviving spouses, as they existed prior to the effective date of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 108. STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS.Any claim filed challenging the validity of sections 101 through 108 of this act not filed before December 31, 2027, is forever barred, if not already barred by an otherwise applicable statute of limitations. As an urgent issue of broad public importance that requires prompt and ultimate determination, any such claim is subject to direct review by the supreme court of Washington. By the effective date of this section, the department of retirement systems shall send notification of the provisions of this act and specifically of the limitations of this section, by first-class mail, to the last known address of each plan 1 active member, retiree, and spousal survivor.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 109. COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS.(1) The department of retirement systems shall seek appropriate guidance from the federal internal revenue service to ensure the continuous compliance of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 and the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system.(2) In the event that the federal internal revenue service formally concludes that legislative changes are needed for the orderly restatement and termination of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 by June 30, 2029, those findings and recommendations for responding to those findings shall be promptly submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate.(3) In the event that any funds have been reverted to the state, and to comply with federal internal revenue service requirements they must be reverted back to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1, those funds must be reverted with interest, as determined by the director of the department of retirement systems.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 110. STUDY OF RESTATED LEOFF OVERSIGHT.(1) The select committee on pension policy shall study the appropriate entity to assume the responsibility of studying issues, developing policies for beneficiaries, and making recommendations to the legislature for the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system. At a minimum, the study should consider both the select committee on pension policy and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board.(2) The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board shall provide assistance to the select committee on pension policy as requested.(3) The select committee on pension policy shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 111. STUDY OF PENSION BOARDS AND MEDICAL LIABILITY.(1) The select committee on pension policy shall study the administration of pension boards and medical benefit liabilities of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1.(2) The study must evaluate options for the state to assume responsibility of pension board administration and for the associated financial liabilities. In reviewing pension board administration, the select committee on pension policy shall consider which state agency or agencies could assume administrative duties of the pension boards.(3) The department of retirement systems, department of labor and industries, the health care authority, and the office of the state actuary shall provide assistance to the select committee on pension policy as requested.(4) The select committee on pension policy shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 112. PENSION SURPLUS HOLDING ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED.The pension surplus holding account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenditures related to implementation of this act. During the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, money in the account may be transferred to the general fund.PART IIAMENDMENTS TO CHAPTER 41.26 RCWSec. 201. RCW 41.26.010 and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:This chapter shall be known and cited as the "Washington Law Enforcement Officers' and Firefighters' Retirement SystemâPlan 2 Act."Sec. 202. RCW 41.26.030 and 2024 c 319 s 4 and 2024 c 304 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest credited thereon.(2) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be available on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's future benefits during the period of retirement.(3) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present monetary value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary value of future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among active and retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement, withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.(4)(((a) "Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be computed and upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be based.(b))) "Basic salary" ((for plan 2 members,)) means salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay. In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of having such member's basic salary be the greater of:(((i)))(a) The basic salary the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature; or(((ii)))(b) Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required because basic salary under (((b)(i)))(a) of this subsection is greater than basic salary under (((b)(ii) of)) this subsection (4)(b) shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions.(5)(((a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit described herein.(b))) "Beneficiary" ((for plan 2 members,)) means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.(6)(a) "Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically disabled as determined by the department, except a person who is disabled and in the full time care of a state institution, who is:(i) A natural born child;(ii) A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter;(iii) A posthumous child;(iv) A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter; or(v) An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable under this chapter.(b) A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of twenty years and eleven months while attending any high school, college, or vocational or other educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which it is located, including the summer vacation months and all other normal and regular vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which the child returns to school.(7) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.(8) "Director" means the director of the department.(9) (("Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county disability board or the city disability board established in RCW 41.26.110.(10) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability retirement. The definition contained in this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.(11) "Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.(12))) "Domestic partners" means two adults who have registered as domestic partners under RCW 26.60.020.(((13)))(10) "Employee" means any law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in subsections (((17) and (19)))(14) and (16) of this section.(((14)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative authority of any city, town, county, district, or regional fire protection service authority or the elected officials of any municipal corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or firefighter, any authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of RCW 41.26.150, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the firefighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over 20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or firefighters as defined in this chapter.(b)))(11)(a) "Employer" ((for plan 2 members,)) means the following entities to the extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or firefighter:(i) The legislative authority of any city, town, county, district, public corporation, or regional fire protection service authority established under RCW 35.21.730 to provide emergency medical services as defined in RCW 18.73.030;(ii) The elected officials of any municipal corporation;(iii) The governing body of any other general authority law enforcement agency;(iv) A four-year institution of higher education having a fully operational fire department as of January 1, 1996; or(v) The department of social and health services or the department of corrections when employing firefighters serving at a prison or civil commitment center on an island.(((c)))(b) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an "employer." The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an "employer," but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an "employer" under this chapter.(((15)(a) "Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed, computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of vesting.(b)))(12)(a) "Final average salary" ((for plan 2 members,)) means the monthly average of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty service credit months of service prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of final average salary.(((c)))(b) In calculating final average salary under (a) ((or (b))) of this subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include:(i) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer;(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or a local government employer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases; and(iii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or a local government employer during the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, furloughs, reductions to current pay, or other similar measures resulting from the COVID-19 budgetary crisis, if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases.(((16)))(13) "Fire department" includes a fire station operated by the department of social and health services or the department of corrections when employing firefighters serving a prison or civil commitment center on an island.(((17)))(14) "Firefighter" means:(a) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member of a fire department of an employer and who is serving in a position which requires passing a civil service examination for firefighter, and who is actively employed as such;(b) Anyone who is actively employed as a full time firefighter where the fire department does not have a civil service examination;(c) Supervisory firefighter personnel;(d) ((Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire protection districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of this subsection (17)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;(e) The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section), if such individual has five years previous membership in a retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (17)(e) shall not apply to plan 2 members;(f))) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil service examination for firefighter;(((g) Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW;(h)))(e) Any person who is employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis by an employer as an emergency medical technician that meets the requirements of RCW 18.71.200 or 18.73.030(13), and whose duties include providing emergency medical services as defined in RCW 18.73.030; and(((i)))(f) Personnel serving on a full-time, fully compensated basis as an employee of a fire department in positions that necessitate experience as a firefighter to perform the essential functions of those positions.(((18)))(15) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, the government of a federally recognized tribe, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, but not including the Washington state patrol. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a limited authority law enforcement agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor and cannabis board, and the state department of corrections. A general authority law enforcement agency under this chapter does not include a government contractor.(((19)))(16) "Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with the following qualifications:(a) No person who is serving in a position that is basically clerical or secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be considered a law enforcement officer;(b) Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a different title pursuant to county charter, who have successfully completed a civil service examination for deputy sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those persons serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;(c) Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police department which have been specifically created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by city charter provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be considered city police officers;(d) ((The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section) if that individual has five years previous membership in the retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (19)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;(e))) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The provisions of this subsection (((19)(e)))(16)(d) shall not apply to any public safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993;(((f)))(e) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person who is employed on or after January 1, 2024, on a full-time basis by the government of a federally recognized tribe within the state of Washington that meets the terms and conditions of RCW 41.26.565, is employed in a police department maintained by that tribe, and who is currently certified as a general authority peace officer under chapter 43.101 RCW; and(((g)))(f) Beginning July 1, 2024, the term "law enforcement officer" also includes any person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, on a less than full-time basis, with the qualifications in (a) through (((e)))(d) of this subsection.(((20) "Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.(a) Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own behalf, for(i) Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is required by the attending physician due to the condition of the patient.(ii) Necessary hospital services, other than board and room, furnished by the hospital.(b) Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered "other medical expenses," provided that they have not been considered as "hospital expenses."(i) The fees of the following:(A) A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;(B) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;(C) A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.(ii) The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily resides in the member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member or the member's spouse.(iii) The charges for the following medical services and supplies:(A) Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;(B) Diagnostic X-ray and laboratory examinations;(C) X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;(D) Anesthesia and oxygen;(E) Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical equipment;(F) Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;(G) Professional ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;(H) Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within ninety days after the accident;(I) Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;(J) Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;(K) Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;(L) An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.(21)))(17) "Member" means any firefighter, law enforcement officer, or other person as would apply under subsection (((17) or (19)))(14) or (16) of this section ((whose membership is transferred to the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system on or after March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and firefighter)) who is employed in that capacity on or after ((such date))October 1, 1977.(((22)))(18) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977, which plan was terminated effective the effective date of this section, and members transferred to the retirement system established by chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act).(((23)))(19) "Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977.(((24)))(20) "Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.(((25)))(21) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.(((26)))(22) "Retiree" ((for persons who establish membership in the retirement system on or after October 1, 1977,)) means any member in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.(((27)))(23) "Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' ((retirement)) system plan 2 retirement fund" as provided for ((herein))in RCW 41.50.075.(((28)))(24) "Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2" provided herein.(((29)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of employment for an employer as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also include service in the armed forces of the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit shall be allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.(i) For members retiring after May 21, 1971, who were employed under the coverage of a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also include (A) such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension act, and (B) such other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular member under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160, or 41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such prior act.(ii) A member who is employed by two employers at the same time shall only be credited with service to one such employer for any month during which the member rendered such dual service.(iii) Reduction efforts such as furloughs, reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or other similar situations as contemplated by subsection (15)(c)(iii) of this section do not result in a reduction in service credit that otherwise would have been earned for that month of work, and the member shall receive the full service credit for the hours that were scheduled to be worked before the reduction.(b)(i)))(25)(a) "Service" ((for plan 2 members,)) means periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for ninety or more hours per calendar month which shall constitute a service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours per calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for less than seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service credit month.(((ii)))(b) Members of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a state elective position may elect to continue to be members of this retirement system.(((iii)))(c) Service credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the total number of service credit months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a service credit year of service as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.(((iv)))(d) If a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during any calendar month, the individual shall receive one service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered; or one-half service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is rendered.(((v)))(e) Reduction efforts such as furloughs, reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or other similar situations as contemplated by subsection (((15)(c)))(12)(b)(iii) of this section do not result in a reduction in service credit that otherwise would have been earned for that month of work, and the member shall receive the full service credit for the hours that were scheduled to be worked before the reduction.(((30)))(26) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.(((31)))(27) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.(((32)))(28) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).(((33)))(29) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.(((34)))(30) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member. (("Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member except as provided in RCW 41.26.162.))Sec. 203. RCW 41.26.040 and 2012 c 117 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 is hereby created for firefighters and law enforcement officers.(1) ((Notwithstanding RCW 41.26.030(20), all))All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed as such on or after ((March 1, 1970))October 1, 1977, on a full time fully compensated basis in this state shall be members of the retirement system established by this chapter with respect to all periods of service as such, to the exclusion of any pension system existing under any prior act.(2) ((Any employee serving as a law enforcement officer or firefighter on March 1, 1970, who is then making retirement contributions under any prior act shall have his or her membership transferred to the system established by this chapter as of such date. Upon retirement for service or for disability, or death, of any such employee, his or her retirement benefits earned under this chapter shall be computed and paid. In addition, his or her benefits under the prior retirement act to which he or she was making contributions at the time of this transfer shall be computed as if he or she had not transferred. For the purpose of such computations, the employee's creditability of service and eligibility for service or disability retirement and survivor and all other benefits shall continue to be as provided in such prior retirement act, as if transfer of membership had not occurred. The excess, if any, of the benefits so computed, giving full value to survivor benefits, over the benefits payable under this chapter shall be paid whether or not the employee has made application under the prior act. If the employee's prior retirement system was the Washington public employees' retirement system, payment of such excess shall be made by that system; if the employee's prior retirement system was the statewide city employees' retirement system, payment of such excess shall be made by the employer which was the member's employer when his or her transfer of membership occurred: PROVIDED, That any death in line of duty lump sum benefit payment shall continue to be the obligation of that system as provided in RCW 41.44.210; in the case of all other prior retirement systems, payment of such excess shall be made by the employer which was the member's employer when his or her transfer of membership occurred.(3))) All funds held by any firefighters' or police officers' relief and pension fund shall remain in that fund for the purpose of paying the obligations of the fund. The municipality shall continue to levy the dollar rate as provided in RCW 41.16.060, and this dollar rate shall be used for the purpose of paying the benefits provided in chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW. The obligations of chapter 41.20 RCW shall continue to be paid from whatever financial sources the city has been using for this purpose.Sec. 204. RCW 41.26.061 and 1997 c 103 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:A member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under RCW ((41.26.120, 41.26.125, 41.26.130, or)) 41.26.470 if the disability is the result of criminal conduct by the member committed after April 21, 1997.PART IIIRESTATED LEOFF RETIREMENT SYSTEMNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 301. APPLICATION OF CHAPTER.This chapter applies to members of the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system. Membership in the system is limited to those persons who were members of plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26 RCW prior to the effective date of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 302. This chapter shall be known and cited as the "restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system act."NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 303. As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest credited thereon.(2) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be available on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's future benefits during the period of retirement.(3) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present monetary value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary value of future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among active and retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement, withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.(4) "Basic salary" means the basic monthly rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be computed and upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be based.(5) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit described herein.(6)(a) "Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically disabled as determined by the department, except a person who is disabled and in the full time care of a state institution, who is:(i) A natural born child;(ii) A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter;(iii) A posthumous child;(iv) A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter; or(v) An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable under this chapter.(b) A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of twenty years and eleven months while attending any high school, college, or vocational or other educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which it is located, including the summer vacation months and all other normal and regular vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which the child returns to school.(7) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.(8) "Director" means the director of the department.(9) "Disability board" means either the county disability board or the city disability board established in section 320 of this act.(10) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability retirement.(11) "Disability retirement" means the period following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.(12) "Domestic partners" means two adults who have registered as domestic partners under RCW 26.60.020.(13) "Employee" means any law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in subsections (17) and (19) of this section.(14)(a) "Employer" means the legislative authority of any city, town, county, district, or regional fire protection service authority or the elected officials of any municipal corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or firefighter, any authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of section 327 of this act, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the firefighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over 20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or firefighters as defined in this chapter.(b) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an "employer." The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an "employer," but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an "employer" under this chapter.(15)(a) "Final average salary" means (i) for a member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed, computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests pursuant to section 317 of this act, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of vesting.(b) In calculating final average salary under (a) of this subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include:(i) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer;(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or a local government employer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases; and(iii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or a local government employer during the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, furloughs, reductions to current pay, or other similar measures resulting from the COVID-19 budgetary crisis, if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases.(16) "Fire department" includes a fire station operated by the department of social and health services or the department of corrections when employing firefighters serving a prison or civil commitment center on an island.(17) "Firefighter" means:(a) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member of a fire department of an employer and who is serving in a position which requires passing a civil service examination for firefighter, and who is actively employed as such;(b) Anyone who is actively employed as a full time firefighter where the fire department does not have a civil service examination;(c) Supervisory firefighter personnel;(d) Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire protection districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031;(e) The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section), if such individual has five years previous membership in a retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW;(f) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil service examination for firefighter;(g) Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW;(h) Any person who is employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis by an employer as an emergency medical technician that meets the requirements of RCW 18.71.200 or 18.73.030(13), and whose duties include providing emergency medical services as defined in RCW 18.73.030; and(i) Personnel serving on a full-time, fully compensated basis as an employee of a fire department in positions that necessitate experience as a firefighter to perform the essential functions of those positions.(18) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, the government of a federally recognized tribe, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, but not including the Washington state patrol. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a limited authority law enforcement agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor and cannabis board, and the state department of corrections. A general authority law enforcement agency under this chapter does not include a government contractor.(19) "Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with the following qualifications:(a) No person who is serving in a position that is basically clerical or secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be considered a law enforcement officer;(b) Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a different title pursuant to county charter, who have successfully completed a civil service examination for deputy sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those persons serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;(c) Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police department which have been specifically created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by city charter provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be considered city police officers;(d) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section) if that individual has five years previous membership in the retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW;(e) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The provisions of this subsection (19)(e) shall not apply to any public safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993;(f) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person who is employed on or after January 1, 2024, on a full-time basis by the government of a federally recognized tribe within the state of Washington that meets the terms and conditions of RCW 41.26.565, is employed in a police department maintained by that tribe, and who is currently certified as a general authority peace officer under chapter 43.101 RCW; and(g) Beginning July 1, 2024, the term "law enforcement officer" also includes any person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, on a less than full-time basis, with the qualifications in (a) through (e) of this subsection.(20) "Medical services" shall include the following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall be paid in accordance with section 327 of this act.(a) Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own behalf, for(i) Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is required by the attending physician due to the condition of the patient.(ii) Necessary hospital services, other than board and room, furnished by the hospital.(b) Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered "other medical expenses," provided that they have not been considered as "hospital expenses."(i) The fees of the following:(A) A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;(B) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;(C) A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.(ii) The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily resides in the member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member or the member's spouse.(iii) The charges for the following medical services and supplies:(A) Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;(B) Diagnostic X-ray and laboratory examinations;(C) X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;(D) Anesthesia and oxygen;(E) Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical equipment;(F) Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;(G) Professional ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;(H) Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within ninety days after the accident;(I) Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;(J) Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;(K) Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;(L) An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.(21) "Member" means any firefighter, law enforcement officer, or other person as would apply under subsection (17) or (19) of this section whose membership is transferred to the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system on or after March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and firefighter who is employed in that capacity on or after such date.(22) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.(23) "Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977.(24) "Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.(25) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.(26) "Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the retirement system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.(27) "Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement fund" as provided for in RCW 41.50.075.(28) "Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system" provided herein.(29) "Service" means all periods of employment for an employer as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also include service in the armed forces of the United States as provided in section 333 of this act. Credit shall be allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.(a) For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also include (i) such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension act, and (ii) such other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular member under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160, or 41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such prior act.(b) A member who is employed by two employers at the same time shall only be credited with service to one such employer for any month during which the member rendered such dual service.(c) Reduction efforts such as furloughs, reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or other similar situations as contemplated by subsection (15)(b)(iii) of this section do not result in a reduction in service credit that otherwise would have been earned for that month of work, and the member shall receive the full service credit for the hours that were scheduled to be worked before the reduction.(30) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.(31) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.(32) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).(33) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.(34) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member. "Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member except as provided in section 330 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 304. The term "minimum medical and health standards" means minimum medical and health standards adopted by the department under this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 305. The restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system is hereby created for firefighters and law enforcement officers.(1) Notwithstanding section 303(21) of this act, all firefighters and law enforcement officers employed as such on or after March 1, 1970, on a full time fully compensated basis in this state shall be members of the retirement system established by this chapter with respect to all periods of service as such, to the exclusion of any pension system existing under any prior act.(2) Any employee serving as a law enforcement officer or firefighter on March 1, 1970, who is then making retirement contributions under any prior act shall have his or her membership transferred to the system established by this chapter as of such date. Upon retirement for service or for disability, or death, of any such employee, his or her retirement benefits earned under this chapter shall be computed and paid. In addition, his or her benefits under the prior retirement act to which he or she was making contributions at the time of this transfer shall be computed as if he or she had not transferred. For the purpose of such computations, the employee's creditability of service and eligibility for service or disability retirement and survivor and all other benefits shall continue to be as provided in such prior retirement act, as if transfer of membership had not occurred. The excess, if any, of the benefits so computed, giving full value to survivor benefits, over the benefits payable under this chapter shall be paid whether or not the employee has made application under the prior act. If the employee's prior retirement system was the Washington public employees' retirement system, payment of such excess shall be made by that system; if the employee's prior retirement system was the statewide city employees' retirement system, payment of such excess shall be made by the employer which was the member's employer when his or her transfer of membership occurred: PROVIDED, That any death in line of duty lump sum benefit payment shall continue to be the obligation of that system as provided in RCW 41.44.210; in the case of all other prior retirement systems, payment of such excess shall be made by the employer which was the member's employer when his or her transfer of membership occurred.(3) All funds held by any firefighters' or police officers' relief and pension fund shall remain in that fund for the purpose of paying the obligations of the fund. The municipality shall continue to levy the dollar rate as provided in RCW 41.16.060, and this dollar rate shall be used for the purpose of paying the benefits provided in chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW. The obligations of chapter 41.20 RCW shall continue to be paid from whatever financial sources the city has been using for this purpose.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 306. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law after February 19, 1974, no law enforcement officer or firefighter, may become eligible for coverage in the pension system established by this chapter, until the individual has met and has been certified as having met minimum medical and health standards: PROVIDED, That an elected sheriff or an appointed chief of police or fire chief, shall not be required to meet the age standard: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in cities and towns having not more than two law enforcement officers and/or not more than two firefighters and if one or more of such persons do not meet the minimum medical and health standards as required by the provisions of this chapter, then such person or persons may join any other pension system that the city has available for its other employees: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That for one year after February 19, 1974, any such medical or health standard now existing or hereinafter adopted, insofar as it establishes a maximum age beyond which an applicant is to be deemed ineligible for coverage, shall be waived as to any applicant for employment or reemployment who is otherwise eligible except for his or her age, who has been a member of any one or more of the retirement systems created by chapter 41.20 RCW and who has restored all contributions which he or she has previously withdrawn from any such system or systems.(2) This section shall not apply to persons who initially establish membership in the retirement system on or after July 1, 1979.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 307. By July 31, 1971, the director of retirement systems shall adopt minimum medical and health standards for membership coverage into the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system. In adopting such standards the director of retirement systems shall consider existing standards recommended by the international association of chiefs of police and the international association of firefighters, and shall adopt equal or higher standards, together with appropriate standards and procedures to ensure uniform compliance with this chapter. The standards when adopted shall be published and distributed to each employer, and each employer shall adopt certification procedures and such other procedures as are required to ensure that no law enforcement officer or firefighter receives membership coverage unless and until he or she has actually met minimum medical and health standards: PROVIDED, That an elected sheriff or an appointed chief of police, fire chief, or director of public safety shall not be required to meet the age standard. The director of retirement systems may amend the minimum medical and health standards as experience indicates, even if the standards as so amended are lower or less rigid than those recommended by the international associations mentioned above. The cost of the medical examination contemplated by this section is to be paid by the employer.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 308. Nothing in sections 304, 306, and 307 of this act shall apply to any firefighters or law enforcement officers who are employed as such on or before August 1, 1971, as long as they continue in such employment; nor to promotional appointments after becoming a member in the police or fire department of any employer nor to the reemployment of a law enforcement officer or firefighter by the same or a different employer within six months after the termination of his or her employment, nor to the reinstatement of a law enforcement officer or firefighter who has been on military or disability leave, disability retirement status, or leave of absence status. Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to prevent any employer from adopting higher medical and health standards than those which are adopted by the director of retirement systems.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 309. (1) A two hundred fourteen thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as if in fact such spouse or domestic partner had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to such member's legal representatives.(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only when death occurs: (a) As a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment; or (b) as a result of an occupational disease or infection that arises naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries. There is no statute of limitations for this benefit. The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.(3) The department of labor and industries shall determine eligibility under subsection (2) of this section for the special death benefit for any beneficiaries who were denied the special death benefit for failing to meet the statute of limitations under Title 51 RCW. If the department of labor and industries determines the beneficiary is eligible for the special death benefit, the department must provide the beneficiary an option to reelect their pension benefit under RCW 41.26.510(2) and if the member elects an ongoing pension benefit, the department must pay the beneficiary retroactive to the date of the member's death.(4)(a) Beginning July 1, 2010, and every year thereafter, the department shall determine the following information:(i) The index for the 2008 calendar year, to be known as "index A";(ii) The index for the calendar year prior to the date of determination, to be known as "index B;" and(iii) The ratio obtained when index B is divided by index A.(b) The value of the ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment to the original death benefit and shall be applied beginning every July 1st. In no event, however, shall the annual adjustment:(i) Produce a benefit which is lower than two hundred fourteen thousand dollars;(ii) Exceed three percent in the initial annual adjustment; or(iii) Differ from the previous year's annual adjustment by more than three percent.(c) For the purposes of this section, "index" means, for any calendar year, that year's average consumer price index â Seattle, Washington area for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 310. (1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right of a person to a retirement allowance, disability allowance, or death benefit, to the return of accumulated contributions, the retirement, disability, or death allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, and the moneys in the fund created under this chapter, are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other process of law whatsoever, whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned and shall be unassignable.(2) On the written request of any person eligible to receive benefits under this section, the department may deduct from such payments the premiums for life, health, or other insurance. The request on behalf of any child or children shall be made by the legal guardian of such child or children. The department may provide for such persons one or more plans of group insurance, through contracts with regularly constituted insurance carriers or health care service contractors.(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) an income withholding order issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 311. No bond of any kind shall be required of a claimant appealing to the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court from a decision of the director affecting such claimant's right to retirement or disability benefits.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 312. (1) The annual compensation taken into account in calculating retiree benefits under this system shall not exceed the limits imposed by section 401(a)(17) of the federal internal revenue code for qualified trusts.(2) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 313. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, persons who fail to:(1) Establish allowable membership service not previously credited;(2) Restore all or a part of that previously credited membership service represented by withdrawn contributions; or(3) Restore service credit represented by a lump sum payment in lieu of benefits, before the deadline established by statute, may do so under the conditions set forth in RCW 41.50.165.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 314. A member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under section 322, 323, or 324 of this act if the disability is the result of criminal conduct by the member committed after April 21, 1997.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 315. Any employer, member or beneficiary who shall knowingly make false statements or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of the retirement system in an attempt to defraud the retirement system, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 316. (1) Except as set forth under subsection (2) of this section, the total liability of the plan 1 system shall be funded as follows:(a) Every plan 1 member shall have deducted from each payroll a sum equal to six percent of his or her basic salary for each pay period.(b) Every employer shall contribute monthly a sum equal to six percent of the basic salary of each plan 1 employee who is a member of this retirement system. The employer shall transmit the employee and employer contributions with a copy of the payroll to the retirement system monthly.(c) The remaining liabilities of the plan 1 system shall be funded as provided in chapter 41.45 RCW.(d) Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the contribution made and provided for herein, and shall receipt in full for his or her salary or compensation. Payment less said contributions shall be a complete discharge of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by such person during the period covered by such payments, except his or her claim to the benefits to which he or she may be entitled under the provisions of this chapter.(2) No employer or member contribution is required after June 30, 2000, unless the most recent valuation study for law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 indicates the plan has unfunded liabilities. The legislature clarifies the enactment of section 907, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess. and affirms the suspension of employer and member contributions to plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, effective June 30, 2000, as provided in this subsection. The legislature intends this 2007 amendment of this subsection to be curative, remedial, and retrospectively applicable to June 30, 2000.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 317. Retirement of a member for service shall be made by the department as follows:(1) Any member having five or more service credit years of service and having attained the age of fifty years shall be eligible for a service retirement allowance and shall be retired upon the member's written request effective the first day following the date upon which the member is separated from service.(2) Any member having five or more service credit years of service, who terminates his or her employment with any employer, may leave his or her contributions in the fund. Any employee who so elects, upon attaining age fifty, shall be eligible to apply for and receive a service retirement allowance based on his or her years of service, commencing on the first day following his or her attainment of age fifty.(3) Any member selecting optional vesting under subsection (2) of this section with less than twenty service credit years of service shall not be covered by the provisions of section 327 of this act, and the member's survivors shall not be entitled to the benefits of section 328 of this act unless his or her death occurs after he or she has attained the age of fifty years. Those members selecting this optional vesting with twenty or more years service shall not be covered by the provisions of section 327 of this act until the attainment of the age of fifty years. A member selecting this optional vesting, with less than twenty service credit years of service credit, who dies prior to attaining the age of fifty years, shall have paid from the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement fund, to such member's surviving spouse, if any, otherwise to such beneficiary as the member shall have designated in writing, or if no such designation has been made, to the personal representative of his or her estate, a lump sum which is equal to the amount of such member's accumulated contributions plus accrued interest. If the vested member has twenty or more service credit years of service credit the surviving spouse or children shall then become eligible for the benefits of section 328 of this act regardless of the member's age at the time of his or her death, to the exclusion of the lump sum amount provided by this subsection.(4) Any member who has attained the age of sixty years shall be retired on the first day of the calendar month next succeeding that in which said member shall have attained the age of sixty and may not thereafter be employed as a law enforcement officer or firefighter: PROVIDED, That for any member who is elected or appointed to the office of sheriff, chief of police, or fire chief, his or her election or appointment shall be considered as a waiver of the age sixty provision for retirement and nonemployment for whatever number of years remain in his or her present term of office and any succeeding periods for which he or she may be so elected or appointed. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any member who is employed as a law enforcement officer or firefighter on March 1, 1970.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 318. (1) A member upon retirement for service shall receive a monthly retirement allowance computed according to his or her completed creditable service credit years of service as follows: Five years but under ten years, one-twelfth of one percent of his or her final average salary for each month of service; ten years but under twenty years, one-twelfth of one and one-half percent of his or her final average salary for each month of service; and twenty years and over one-twelfth of two percent of his or her final average salary for each month of service: PROVIDED, That the recipient of a retirement allowance who shall return to service as a law enforcement officer or firefighter shall be considered to have terminated his or her retirement status and he or she shall immediately become a member of the retirement system with the status of membership he or she had as of the date of retirement. Retirement benefits shall be suspended during the period of his or her return to service and he or she shall make contributions and receive service credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire at any time and his or her retirement allowance shall be recomputed, and paid, based upon additional service rendered and any change in final average salary.(2) Beginning four months after the effective date of this section, a member with fewer than five years of service shall, upon retirement for service, receive a monthly retirement allowance of one-twelfth of one percent of his or her final average salary for each month of service. This subsection serves to fully vest all members.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 319. (1) At the time of retirement, plan 1 members may purchase an optional actuarially equivalent life annuity benefit from the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 retirement fund established in RCW 41.50.075. A minimum payment of twenty-five thousand dollars is required.(2) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing an annuity under this section must pay all of the cost with an eligible rollover, direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan.(a) The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all eligible rollovers and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.(b) "Eligible retirement plan" means a tax qualified plan offered by a governmental employer.(3) Plan 1 members whose retirement was effective prior to June 9, 2016, may purchase an annuity under this section between January 1, 2017, and June 1, 2017.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 320. (1) All claims for disability shall be acted upon and either approved or disapproved by either type of disability board authorized to be created in this section.(a) Each city having a population of twenty thousand or more shall establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by those cities and composed of the following five members: Two members of the city legislative body to be appointed by the mayor; one active or retired firefighter employed by or retired from the city to be elected by the firefighters employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; one active or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from the city to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; and one member from the public at large who resides within the city to be appointed by the other four members designated in this subsection. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city are eligible for election. Each of the elected members shall serve a two year term. If there are either no firefighters or law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law enforcement officers or firefighters eligible to vote. The members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms: PROVIDED, That cities of the first class only, shall retain existing firefighters' pension boards established pursuant to RCW 41.16.020 and existing boards of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police department as established pursuant to RCW 41.20.010 which such boards shall have authority to act upon and approve or disapprove claims for disability by firefighters or law enforcement officers as provided under the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system act.(b) If no eligible active or retired firefighter or law enforcement officer is willing or able to be elected to the board under (a) of this subsection, then the following individuals may be elected to the board under (a) of this subsection:(i) Any active or retired firefighter under this chapter or chapters 41.16, 41.18, and 52.26 RCW or law enforcement officers under this chapter or chapter 41.20 RCW who resides within the jurisdiction served by the board;(ii) The surviving spouse or domestic partner of a firefighter or law enforcement officer subject to the jurisdiction of the board.(c) Each county shall establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by or retired from an employer within the county and not employed by a city in which a disability board is established. The county disability board so created shall be composed of five members to be chosen as follows: One member of the legislative body of the county to be appointed by the county legislative body; one member of a city or town legislative body located within the county which does not contain a city disability board established pursuant to (a) of this subsection to be chosen by a majority of the mayors of such cities and towns within the county which does not contain a city disability board; one active firefighter or retired firefighter employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected by the firefighters employed or retired from an employer within the county who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; one law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed in or retired from an employer within the county who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; and one member from the public at large who resides within the county but does not reside within a city in which a city disability board is established, to be appointed by the other four members designated in this subsection. However, in counties with a population less than sixty thousand, the member of the disability board appointed by a majority of the mayors of the cities and towns within the county that do not contain a city disability board must be a resident of one of the cities and towns but need not be a member of a city or town legislative body. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed by or retired from an employer within the county are eligible for election. All members appointed or elected pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms. If there are no firefighters under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law enforcement officers eligible to vote. If there are no law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible representative shall be elected by the firefighters eligible to vote.(d) If no eligible active or retired firefighter or law enforcement officer is willing or able to be elected to the board under (c) of this subsection, then the following individuals may be elected to the board under (c) of this subsection:(i) Any active or retired firefighter under this chapter or chapters 41.16, 41.18, and 52.26 RCW or law enforcement officers under this chapter or chapter 41.20 RCW who resides within the jurisdiction served by the board;(ii) The surviving spouse or domestic partner of a firefighter or law enforcement officer subject to the jurisdiction of the board.(2) The members of both the county and city disability boards shall not receive compensation for their service upon the boards but the members shall be reimbursed by their respective county or city for all expenses incidental to such service as to the amount authorized by law.(3) The disability boards authorized for establishment by this section shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, and make all such determinations as specified in this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 321. (1) The director of retirement systems shall adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, under which each disability board shall execute its disability retirement duties under this chapter. The rules shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(a) Standards governing the type and manner of presentation of medical, employability, and other evidence before disability boards; and(b) Standards governing the necessity and frequency of medical and employability reexaminations of persons receiving disability benefits.(2) If the director determines that an order or determination of a disability board was not processed in accordance with the rules established under this section, the director may remand the order or determination for further proceedings consistent with the rules.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 322. Any member, regardless of age or years of service may be retired by the disability board, subject to approval by the director, for any disability incurred in the line of duty which has been continuous since his or her discontinuance of service and which renders the member unable to continue service. No disability retirement allowance shall be paid until the expiration of a period of six months after the discontinuance of service during which period the member, if found to be physically or mentally unfit for duty by the disability board following receipt of his or her application for disability retirement, shall be granted a disability leave by the disability board and shall receive an allowance equal to the full monthly salary and shall continue to receive all other benefits provided to active employees from the employer for such period. However, if, at any time during the initial six-month period, the disability board finds the beneficiary is no longer disabled, the disability leave allowance shall be canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the same rank or position, if any, held by the beneficiary at the time the member became disabled. Applications for disability retirement shall be processed in accordance with the following procedures:(1) Any member who believes he or she is or is believed to be physically or mentally disabled shall be examined by such medical authority as the disability board shall employ, upon application of the member, or a person acting in his or her behalf, stating that the member is disabled, either physically or mentally: PROVIDED, That no such application shall be considered unless the member or someone in his or her behalf, in case of the incapacity of a member, shall have filed the application within a period of one year from and after the discontinuance of service of the member.(2) If the examination shows, to the satisfaction of the disability board, that the member is physically or mentally disabled from the further performance of duty, that such disability was incurred in the line of duty, and that such disability has been continuous from the discontinuance of service, the disability board shall enter its written decision and order, accompanied by appropriate findings of fact and by conclusions evidencing compliance with this chapter, granting the member a disability retirement allowance; otherwise, if the member is not found by the disability board to be so disabled, the application shall be denied pursuant to a similar written decision and order, subject to appeal to the director in accordance with section 339 of this act: PROVIDED, That in any order granting a duty disability retirement allowance, the disability board shall make a finding that the disability was incurred in line of duty.(3) Every order of a disability board granting a duty disability retirement allowance shall immediately be reviewed by the director except the finding that the disability was incurred in the line of duty. The director may affirm the decision of the disability board or remand the case for further proceedings, or the director may reverse the decision of the disability board if the director finds the disability board's findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:(a) In violation of constitutional provisions;(b) In excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the disability board;(c) Made upon unlawful procedure;(d) Affected by other error of law;(e) Clearly erroneous in view of the entire record as submitted and the public policy contained in this chapter; or(f) Arbitrary or capricious.(4) Every member who can establish, to the disability board, that he or she is physically or mentally disabled from the further performance of duty, that such disability was incurred in the line of duty, and that such disability will be in existence for a period of at least six months may waive the six-month period of disability leave and be immediately granted a duty disability retirement allowance, subject to the approval of the director as provided in subsection (3) of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 323. Any member, regardless of age or years of service, may be retired by the disability board, subject to approval by the director as provided in this section, for any disability not incurred in the line of duty which has been continuous since discontinuance of service and which renders the member unable to continue service. No disability retirement allowance may be paid until the expiration of a period of six months after the discontinuance of service during which period the member, if found to be physically or mentally unfit for duty by the disability board following receipt of the member's application for disability retirement, shall be granted a disability leave by the disability board and shall receive an allowance equal to the member's full monthly salary and shall continue to receive all other benefits provided to active employees from the member's employer for the period. However, if, at any time during the initial six-month period, the disability board finds the beneficiary is no longer disabled, the disability leave allowance shall be canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the same rank or position, if any, held by the member at the time the member became disabled. Applications for disability retirement shall be processed in accordance with the following procedures:(1) Any member who believes he or she is, or is believed to be, physically or mentally disabled shall be examined by such medical authority as the disability board shall employ, upon application of the member, or a person acting in the member's behalf, stating that the member is disabled, either physically or mentally: PROVIDED, That no such application shall be considered unless the member or someone acting in the member's behalf, in case of the incapacity of a member, has filed the application within a period of one year from and after the discontinuance of service of the member.(2) If the examination shows, to the satisfaction of the disability board, that the member is physically or mentally disabled from the further performance of duty, that such disability was not incurred in the line of duty, and that such disability had been continuous from the discontinuance of service, the disability board shall enter its written decision and order, accompanied by appropriate findings of fact and by conclusions evidencing compliance with this chapter, granting the member a disability retirement allowance. Otherwise, if the member is not found by the disability board to be so disabled, the application shall be denied pursuant to a similar written decision and order, subject to appeal to the director in accordance with section 339 of this act: PROVIDED, That in any order granting a nonduty disability retirement allowance, the disability board shall make a finding that the disability was not incurred in the line of duty.(3) Every order of a disability board granting a nonduty disability retirement allowance shall immediately be reviewed by the director except the finding that the disability was not incurred in the line of duty. The director may affirm the decision of the disability board or remand the case for further proceedings, or the director may reverse the decision of the disability board if the director finds the disability board's findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:(a) In violation of constitutional provisions;(b) In excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the disability board;(c) Made upon unlawful procedure;(d) Affected by other error of law;(e) Clearly erroneous in view of the entire record as submitted and the public policy contained in this chapter; or(f) Arbitrary or capricious.(4) Every member who can establish to the disability board that the member is physically or mentally disabled from the further performance of duty, that such disability was not incurred in the line of duty, and that such disability will be in existence for a period of at least six months, may waive the six-month period of disability leave and be immediately granted a nonduty disability retirement allowance, subject to the approval of the director as provided in subsection (3) of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 324. (1) Upon retirement for disability a member shall be entitled to receive a monthly retirement allowance computed as follows: (a) A basic amount of fifty percent of final average salary at time of disability retirement, and (b) an additional five percent of final average salary for each child as defined in section 303(6) of this act, (c) the combined total of (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not exceed a maximum of sixty percent of final average salary.(2) A disabled member shall begin receiving the disability retirement allowance as of the expiration of his or her six month period of disability leave or, if his or her application was filed after the sixth month of discontinuance of service but prior to the one year time limit, the member's disability retirement allowance shall be retroactive to the end of the sixth month.(3) Benefits under this section will be payable until the member recovers from the disability or dies. If at the time that the disability ceases the member is over the age of fifty, he or she shall then receive either disability retirement allowance or retirement for service allowance, whichever is greater.(4) Benefits under this section for a disability that is incurred while in other employment will be reduced by any amount the member receives or is entitled to receive from workers' compensation, social security, group insurance, other pension plan, or any other similar source provided by another employer on account of the same disability.(5) A member retired for disability shall be subject to periodic examinations by a physician approved by the disability board prior to attainment of age fifty, pursuant to rules adopted by the director under section 321 of this act. Examinations of members who retired for disability prior to July 26, 1981, shall not exceed two medical examinations per year.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 325. (1) A disabled member who believes that his or her disability has ceased in accordance with section 324(3) of this act may make application to the disability board which originally found the member to be disabled, for a determination that the disability has ceased.(2) Every order of a disability board determining that a member's disability has ceased pursuant to section 324(3) of this act shall immediately be reviewed by the director. The director may affirm the decision of the disability board or remand the case for further proceedings if the director finds the disability board's findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:(a) In violation of constitutional provisions;(b) In excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the disability board;(c) Made upon unlawful procedure;(d) Affected by other error of law;(e) Clearly erroneous in view of the entire record as submitted and the public policy contained in this chapter; or(f) Arbitrary or capricious.(3) Determinations of whether a disability has ceased under section 324(3) of this act and this section shall be made in accordance with the same procedures and standards governing other cancellations of disability retirement.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 326. (1) Upon the basis of reexaminations of members on disability retirement as provided in section 324 of this act, the disability board shall determine whether such disability beneficiary is still unable to perform his or her duties either physically or mentally for service in the department where he or she was employed.(2) If the disability board determines that the beneficiary is not so incapacitated the retirement allowance shall be canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the same civil service rank, if any, held by the beneficiary at the time of his or her retirement or if unable to perform the duties of that rank, then, at his or her request, in such other like or lesser rank as may be or become open and available, the duties of which he or she is then able to perform. In no event, shall a beneficiary previously drawing a disability allowance be returned or be restored to duty at a salary or rate of pay less than the current salary attached to the rank or position held by the beneficiary at the date of retirement for disability. If the disability board determines that the beneficiary is able to return to service he or she shall be entitled to notice and a hearing, both the notice and the hearing shall comply with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW.(3) Should a disability beneficiary reenter service and be eligible for membership in the retirement system, the retirement allowance shall be canceled and he or she shall immediately become a member of the retirement system.(4) Should any disability beneficiary under age fifty refuse to submit to examination, the retirement allowance shall be discontinued until withdrawal of such refusal, and should such refusal continue for one year or more, the retirement allowance shall be canceled.(5) Should the disability retirement allowance of any disability beneficiary be canceled for any cause other than reentrance into service or retirement for service, he or she shall be paid the excess, if any, of the accumulated contributions at the time of retirement over all payments made on his or her behalf under this chapter.(6) Any person feeling aggrieved by an order of a disability board determining that a beneficiary's disability has not ceased, pursuant to section 324(3) of this act has the right to appeal the order or determination to the director. The director shall have no jurisdiction to entertain the appeal unless a notice of appeal is filed with the director within thirty days following the rendition of the order by the disability board. A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served upon the director and the applicable disability board and, within ninety days thereof, the disability board shall certify its decision and order which shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law, together with a transcript of all proceedings in connection therewith, to the director for review. Upon review of the record, the director may affirm the order of the disability board or may remand the case for further proceedings if the director finds that the disability board's findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:(a) In violation of constitutional provisions;(b) In excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the disability board;(c) Made upon unlawful procedure;(d) Affected by other error of law;(e) Clearly erroneous in view of the entire record as submitted and the public policy contained in this chapter; or(f) Arbitrary or capricious.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 327. (1) Whenever any active member, or any member hereafter retired, on account of service, sickness, or disability, not caused or brought on by dissipation or abuse, of which the disability board shall be judge, is confined in any hospital or in home, and whether or not so confined, requires medical services, the employer shall pay for the active or retired member the necessary medical services not payable from some other source as provided for in subsection (2) of this section. In the case of active or retired firefighters the employer may make the payments provided for in this section from the firefighters' pension fund established pursuant to RCW 41.16.050 where the fund had been established prior to March 1, 1970. If this pension fund is depleted, the employer shall have the obligation to pay all benefits payable under chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW.(a) The disability board in all cases may have the active or retired member suffering from such sickness or disability examined at any time by a licensed physician or physicians, to be appointed by the disability board, for the purpose of ascertaining the nature and extent of the sickness or disability, the physician or physicians to report to the disability board the result of the examination within three days thereafter. Any active or retired member who refuses to submit to such examination or examinations shall forfeit all rights to benefits under this section for the period of the refusal.(b) The disability board shall designate the medical services available to any sick or disabled member.(2) The medical services payable under this section will be reduced by any amount received or eligible to be received by the member under workers' compensation, social security including the changes incorporated under Public Law 89-97, insurance provided by another employer, other pension plan, or any other similar source. Failure to apply for coverage if otherwise eligible under the provisions of Public Law 89-97 shall not be deemed a refusal of payment of benefits thereby enabling collection of charges under the provisions of this chapter.(3) Upon making the payments provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the employer shall be subrogated to all rights of the member against any third party who may be held liable for the member's injuries or for payment of the cost of medical services in connection with a member's sickness or disability to the extent necessary to recover the amount of payments made by the employer.(4) Any employer under this chapter, either singly, or jointly with any other such employer or employers through an association thereof as provided for in chapter 48.21 RCW, may provide for all or part of one or more plans of group hospitalization and medical aid insurance to cover any of its employees who are members of the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and/or retired former employees who were, before retirement, members of the retirement system, through contracts with regularly constituted insurance carriers, with health maintenance organizations as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW, or with health care service contractors as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW. Benefits payable under the plan or plans shall be deemed to be amounts received or eligible to be received by the active or retired member under subsection (2) of this section.(5) Any employer under this chapter may, at its discretion, elect to reimburse a retired former employee under this chapter for premiums the retired former employee has paid for medical insurance that supplements medicare, including premiums the retired former employee has paid for medicare part B coverage.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 328. (1) In the event of the duty connected death of any member who is in active service, or who has vested under the provisions of section 317 of this act with twenty or more service credit years of service, or who is on duty connected disability leave or retired for duty connected disability, or upon the death of a member who has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard or military reserves and dies while honorably serving in the national guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse shall become entitled, subject to section 330 of this act, to receive a monthly allowance equal to fifty percent of the final average salary at the date of death if active, or the amount of retirement allowance the vested member would have received at age fifty, or the amount of the retirement allowance such retired member was receiving at the time of death if retired for duty connected disability. The amount of this allowance will be increased five percent of final average salary for each child as defined in section 303(6) of this act, subject to a maximum combined allowance of sixty percent of final average salary: PROVIDED, That if the child or children is or are in the care of a legal guardian, payment of the increase attributable to each child will be made to the child's legal guardian or, in the absence of a legal guardian and if the member has created a trust for the benefit of the child or children, payment of the increase attributable to each child will be made to the trust.(2) If at the time of the duty connected death of a vested member with twenty or more service credit years of service as provided in subsection (1) of this section or a member retired for duty connected disability, or at the time of the death of a member who has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard or military reserves and dies while honorably serving in the national guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse has not been lawfully married to such member for one year prior to retirement or separation from service if a vested member, the surviving spouse shall not be eligible to receive the benefits under this section: PROVIDED, That if a member dies as a result of a disability incurred in the line of duty or while honorably serving in the national guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, then if he or she was married at the time he or she was disabled or left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse shall be eligible to receive the benefits under this section.(3) If there be no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits at the time of such member's duty connected death, then the child or children of such member shall receive a monthly allowance equal to thirty percent of final average salary for one child and an additional ten percent for each additional child subject to a maximum combined payment, under this subsection, of sixty percent of final average salary. When there cease to be any eligible children as defined in section 303(6) of this act, there shall be paid to the legal heirs of the member the excess, if any, of accumulated contributions of the member at the time of death over all payments made to survivors on his or her behalf under this chapter: PROVIDED, That payments under this subsection to children shall be prorated equally among the children, if more than one. If the member has created a trust for the benefit of the child or children, the payment shall be made to the trust.(4) In the event that there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits under this section, and that there be no child or children eligible to receive benefits under this section, then the accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of the member.(5) If a surviving spouse receiving benefits under this section remarries after June 13, 2002, the surviving spouse shall continue to receive the benefits under this section.(6) If a surviving spouse receiving benefits under the provisions of this section thereafter dies and there are children as defined in section 303(6) of this act, payment to the spouse shall cease and the child or children shall receive the benefits as provided in subsection (3) of this section.(7) The payment provided by this section shall become due the day following the date of death and payments shall be retroactive to that date.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 329. (1) In the event of the nonduty connected death of any member who is in active service, or who has vested under section 317 of this act with twenty or more service credit years of service, or who is on disability leave or retired, whether for nonduty connected disability or service, the surviving spouse shall become entitled to receive a monthly allowance equal to fifty percent of the final average salary at the date of death if active, or the amount of retirement allowance the vested member would have received at age fifty, or the amount of the retirement allowance such retired member was receiving at the time of death if retired for service or nonduty connected disability. The amount of this allowance will be increased five percent of final average salary for each child as defined in section 303(6) of this act, subject to a maximum combined allowance of sixty percent of final average salary: PROVIDED, That if the child or children is or are in the care of a legal guardian, payment of the increase attributable to each child will be made to the child's legal guardian or, in the absence of a legal guardian and if the member has created a trust for the benefit of the child or children, payment of the increase attributable to each child will be made to the trust.(2) If at the time of the death of a vested member with twenty or more service credit years of service as provided in subsection (1) of this section or a member retired for service or disability, the surviving spouse has not been lawfully married to such member for one year prior to retirement or separation from service if a vested member, the surviving spouse shall not be eligible to receive the benefits under this section.(3) If there be no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits at the time of such member's death, then the child or children of such member shall receive a monthly allowance equal to thirty percent of final average salary for one child and an additional ten percent for each additional child subject to a maximum combined payment, under this subsection, of sixty percent of final average salary. When there cease to be any eligible children as defined in section 303(6) of this act, there shall be paid to the legal heirs of the member the excess, if any, of accumulated contributions of the member at the time of death over all payments made to survivors on his or her behalf under this chapter: PROVIDED, That payments under this subsection to children shall be prorated equally among the children, if more than one. If the member has created a trust for the benefit of the child or children, the payment shall be made to the trust.(4) In the event that there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits under this section, and that there be no child or children eligible to receive benefits under this section, then the accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of the member.(5) If a surviving spouse receiving benefits under this section remarries after June 13, 2002, the surviving spouse shall continue to receive the benefits under this section.(6) If a surviving spouse receiving benefits under the provisions of this section thereafter dies and there are children as defined in section 303(6) of this act, payment to the spouse shall cease and the child or children shall receive the benefits as provided in subsection (3) of this section.(7) The payment provided by this section shall become due the day following the date of death and payments shall be retroactive to that date.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 330. (1) An ex spouse of a law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system retiree shall qualify as surviving spouse under section 328 or 329 of this act if the ex spouse has been provided benefits under any currently effective court decree of dissolution or legal separation or in any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation. Such an ex spouse shall continue to receive the court-awarded portion of the member's benefit after the member's death as if the member was still alive.(2) An ex spouse whose benefit resumes as a result of chapter 62, Laws of 2005 shall receive an initial payment equivalent to that portion of the member's benefit received prior to its suspension. The benefit will not be adjusted under section 342 of this act for the period the allowance was suspended.(3) Chapter 62, Laws of 2005 shall not result in the payment of benefits for the period during which benefits were suspended.(4) This section shall apply retroactively.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 331. (1) No later than July 1, 2005, the department shall adopt rules to allow a member who meets the criteria set forth in subsection (2) of this section to choose an actuarially equivalent benefit that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates shall be continued throughout the life of a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under section 328 or 329 of this act.(2) To choose an actuarially equivalent benefit according to subsection (1) of this section, a member shall:(a) Have a portion of the retirement allowance payable to the retiree that is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670; and(b) Choose an actuarially reduced benefit equivalent to that portion not subject to periodic payments under (a) of this subsection during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of marriage to the survivor benefit-ineligible spouse.(3)(a) A member who married a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under section 328 or 329 of this act prior to the effective date of the rules adopted under this section and satisfies subsection (2)(a) of this section has one year to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.(b) A member who married a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under section 328 or 329 of this act, has been married to that spouse for at least two years prior to September 1, 2015, and satisfies subsection (2)(a) of this section has one year from September 1, 2015, to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary. The office of the state actuary must provide the department with administrative factors to ensure that the benefits provided under this section are actuarially equivalent.(c) A deceased member's spouse who was eligible to be provided a survivor benefit under subsection (1) of this section but the member did not select a survivor benefit, and who prior to March 1, 2015, exhausted all administrative remedies with the department for establishing eligibility for a benefit under this section, is eligible beginning August 1, 2015, for a retirement allowance equal to two-thirds of the gross monthly retirement allowance the retired member received at the time of death.(4) No benefit provided to a child survivor beneficiary under section 328 or 329 of this act is affected or reduced by the member's selection of the actuarially reduced spousal survivor benefit provided by this section.(5)(a) Any member who chose to receive a reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1) of this section is entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection if:(i) The retiree's survivor spouse designated in subsection (1) of this section predeceases the retiree; and(ii) The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the designated beneficiary's death.(b) The retirement allowance payable to the retiree from the beginning of the month following the date of the beneficiary's death shall be increased by the following:(i) One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection converted to a percent;(ii) Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option factor.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 332. (1) Should service of a member be discontinued except by death, disability, or retirement, the member shall, upon application therefor, be paid the accumulated contributions within sixty days after the day of application and the rights to all benefits as a member shall cease: PROVIDED, That any member with at least five years' service may elect the provisions of section 317(2) of this act.(2) Any member whose contributions have been paid in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and who reenters the service of an employer shall upon the restoration of withdrawn contributions, which restoration must be completed within a total period of five years of service following resumption of employment, then receive credit toward retirement for the period of previous service which these contributions are to cover.(3) If the member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection (2) of this section, the member may make the payment required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement. The member shall then receive credit toward retirement for the period of previous service that the withdrawn contributions cover.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 333. Each person affected by this chapter who at the time of entering the armed services was a member of this system, and has honorably served in the armed services of the United States, shall have added to the period of service as computed under this chapter, the period of service in the armed forces: PROVIDED, That such credited service shall not exceed five years.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 334. If a member of this retirement system served as a law enforcement officer or firefighter under a prior pension system and that service is not creditable to this retirement system because the member withdrew his or her contributions plus accrued interest from the prior pension system, the member's prior service as a law enforcement officer shall be credited to this retirement system if the member pays to the retirement system the amount under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 335. If a member's prior service as a law enforcement officer or firefighter under a prior pension system is not creditable because, although employed in a position covered by a prior pension act, the member had not yet become a member of the pension system governed by the act, the member's prior service as a law enforcement officer or firefighter shall be creditable, if the member pays to the plan the amount set forth under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 336. Any member of the teachers' retirement system plans 1, 2, or 3, the public employees' retirement system plans 1, 2, or 3, the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2, the school employees' retirement system plans 2 or 3, or the Washington state patrol retirement system plans 1 or 2 who has previously established service credit in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 may make an irrevocable election to have such service transferred to their current retirement system and plan subject to the following conditions:(1) If the individual is employed by an employer in an eligible position, as of July 1, 1997, the election to transfer service must be filed in writing with the department no later than July 1, 1998. If the individual is not employed by an employer in an eligible position, as of July 1, 1997, the election to transfer service must be filed in writing with the department no later than one year from the date they are employed by an employer in an eligible position.(2) An individual transferring service under this section forfeits the rights to all benefits as a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 and will be permanently excluded from membership.(3) Any individual choosing to transfer service under this section will have transferred to their current retirement system and plan: (a) All the individual's accumulated contributions; (b) an amount sufficient to ensure that the employer contribution rate in the individual's current system and plan will not increase due to the transfer; and (c) all applicable months of service, as defined in section 303(29) of this act.(4) If an individual has withdrawn contributions from the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, the individual may restore the contributions, together with interest as determined by the director, and recover the service represented by the contributions for the sole purpose of transferring service under this section. The contributions must be restored before the transfer can occur and the restoration must be completed within the time limitations specified in subsection (1) of this section.(5) Service transferred under this section is applicable for meeting the total service required for military service credit as defined in RCW 41.40.170(3) but is not applicable for meeting the total service credit required for military service credit under RCW 43.43.260(3). This subsection applies to members who retired on or after January 1, 1998.(6) If an individual does not meet the time limitations of subsection (1) of this section, the individual may elect to restore any withdrawn contributions and transfer service under this section by paying the amount required under subsection (3)(b) of this section less any employee contributions transferred.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 337. (1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided under the provisions of this chapter.(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The basic salary reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 338. (1) A member eligible to retire under section 317 of this act may, at the time of filing a written application for retirement with the department, apply to the department to make a one-time purchase of up to five years of additional service credit.(2) To purchase additional service credit under this section, a member shall pay the actuarial equivalent value of the resulting increase in the member's benefit.(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing additional service credit under this section may pay all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover, direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.(4) Additional service credit purchased under this section is not membership service and shall be used exclusively to provide the member with a monthly annuity that is paid in addition to the member's retirement allowance.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 339. Any person feeling aggrieved by any order or determination of a disability board denying disability leave or disability retirement, or canceling a previously granted disability retirement allowance, shall have the right to appeal the order or determination to the director. The director shall have no jurisdiction to entertain the appeal unless a notice of appeal is filed with the director within thirty days following the rendition of the order by the applicable disability board. A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served upon the director and the applicable disability board and, within ninety days thereof, the disability board shall certify its decision and order which shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law, together with a transcript of all proceedings in connection therewith, to the director for review. Upon review of the record, the director may affirm the order of the disability board or may remand the case for such further proceedings as he or she may direct, in accordance with such rules of procedure as the director shall adopt.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 340. Any person aggrieved by any final decision of the director must, before petitioning for judicial review, file with the director of the retirement system by mail or personally within sixty days from the day the decision was communicated to the person, a notice for a hearing. The notice of hearing shall set forth in full detail the grounds upon which such person considers such decision unjust or unlawful and shall include every issue to be considered, and it must contain a detailed statement of facts upon which such person relies in support thereof. Such persons shall be deemed to have waived all objections or irregularities concerning the matter on which such appeal is taken other than those specifically set forth in the notice of hearing or appearing in the records of the retirement system.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 341. A hearing shall be held by the director, or the director's duly authorized representative, in the county of the residence of the claimant at a time and place designated by the director. Such hearing shall be de novo and shall conform to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. The disability board and the department shall be entitled to appear in all such proceedings and introduce testimony in support of the decision. Judicial review of any final decision by the director shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 342. For purposes of this section:(1) "Index" shall mean, for any calendar year, that year's average Consumer Price IndexâSeattle, Washington area for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items (1957-1959=100), compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor;(2) "Retirement allowance" shall mean the retirement allowance provided for in sections 318 and 324 of this act, and the monthly allowance provided for in section 328 of this act.Effective April 1 of 1971, and of each succeeding year, every retirement allowance which has been in effect for more than one year shall be adjusted to that dollar amount which exceeds its original dollar amount by the percentage difference which the department finds to exist between the index for the previous calendar year and the index for the calendar year prior to the effective retirement date of the person to whom, or on behalf of whom, such retirement allowance is being paid.For the purposes of this section, basic allowance shall mean that portion of a total retirement allowance, and any cost-of-living adjustment thereon, attributable to a member (individually) and shall not include the increased amounts attributable to the existence of a child or children. In those cases where a child ceases to be qualified as an eligible child, so as to lessen the total allowance, the allowance shall, at that time, be reduced to the basic allowance plus the amount attributable for the appropriate number of eligible children. In those cases where a child qualifies as an eligible child subsequent to the retirement of a member so as to increase the total allowance payable, such increased allowance shall at the time of the next and appropriate subsequent cost-of-living adjustments, be considered the original dollar amount of the allowance.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 343. All benefits presently payable pursuant to the provisions of RCW 41.20.050, 41.20.060, and 41.20.080 as such RCW sections existed prior to the effective date of the amendment of such RCW sections by sections 1, 2, 3, chapter 191, Laws of 1961 to persons who retired prior to the effective date of the 1961 amendatory act, shall be increased annually as provided in this section. The local pension board shall meet subsequent to March 31st but prior to June 30th of each year for the purpose of adjusting benefit allowances payable pursuant to RCW 41.20.050, 41.20.060, and 41.20.080. The local board shall determine the increase in the consumer price index between January 1st and December 31st of the previous year and increase in dollar amount the benefits payable subsequent to July 1st of the year in which the board makes such determination by a dollar amount proportionate to the increase in the consumer price index: PROVIDED, That regardless of the change in the consumer price index, such increase shall be at least two percent each year such adjustment is made.Each year effective with the July payment all benefits specified in this section, shall be increased as authorized by this section. This benefit increase shall be paid monthly as part of the regular pension payment and shall be cumulative.For the purpose of this section the term "consumer price index" shall mean, for any calendar year, the consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 344. All benefits presently payable pursuant to the provisions of RCW 41.20.085 which are not related to the amount of current salary attached to the position held by the deceased member, shall be increased annually in the same manner and to the same extent as provided for pursuant to section 343 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 345. The legislature of the state of Washington hereby declares that the relationship between members of the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system and their governmental employers is similar to that of workers to their employers and that the sure and certain relief granted by this chapter is desirable, and as beneficial to such law enforcement officers and firefighters as workers' compensation coverage is to persons covered by Title 51 RCW. The legislature further declares that removal of law enforcement officers and firefighters from workers' compensation coverage under Title 51 RCW necessitates the (1) continuance of sure and certain relief for personal injuries incurred in the course of employment or occupational disease, which the legislature finds to be accomplished by the provisions of this chapter and (2) protection for the governmental employer from actions at law; and to this end the legislature further declares that the benefits and remedies conferred by this chapter upon law enforcement officers and firefighters covered under this chapter, shall be to the exclusion of any other remedy, proceeding, or compensation for personal injuries or sickness, caused by the governmental employer except as otherwise provided by this chapter; and to that end all civil actions and civil causes of actions by such law enforcement officers and firefighters against their governmental employers for personal injuries or sickness are hereby abolished, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 346. If injury or death results to a member from the intentional or negligent act or omission of a member's governmental employer, the member, the widow, widower, child, or dependent of the member shall have the privilege to benefit under this chapter and also have cause of action against the governmental employer as otherwise provided by law, for any excess of damages over the amount received or receivable under this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 347. (1) Law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 1 active members, term-vested members, retirees, and survivors eligible for benefits under the plan 1 provisions of this chapter on June 9, 2022, shall be eligible to receive the plan 1 lump sum defined benefit of $100 per service credit month payable by January 31, 2023.(a) Members who retired for an in the line of duty disability under section 322 of this act shall receive the greater of the lump sum defined benefit of $100 per service credit month or a lump sum defined benefit of $20,000.(b) A member's beneficiary is eligible for an in the line of duty death benefit under section 309 of this act. If there is more than one eligible beneficiary the lump sum defined benefit will be distributed in accordance with section 309 of this act.(c) If the member is deceased the member's survivor beneficiary under section 328 of this act is eligible for this lump sum defined benefit.(2) If a member is active or term-vested, interest on the lump sum defined benefit as determined by the director of retirement systems shall accumulate from January 1, 2023, until distribution to the participant upon retirement from service or for disability. For the purposes of this section, a "term-vested member" is a member who has rendered five years of service, has not withdrawn his or her member contributions, and who has not applied for retirement.(3) If a member dies after June 9, 2022, but before distribution of the lump sum defined benefit created in this section occurs, the distribution shall be made according to the member's beneficiary designation under this chapter.(4) The lump sum defined benefit created in this section is subject to section 310 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 348. To the extent that the provisions of this act are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this act shall be controlling.PART IVCONFORMING AMENDMENTSSec. 401. RCW 2.10.155 and 1990 c 274 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No judge shall be eligible to receive the judge's monthly service or disability retirement allowance if the retired judge is employed:(a) For more than eight hundred ten hours in a calendar year as a pro tempore judge; or(b) In an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010 or 41.32.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act.(2) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, a previously elected judge of the superior court who retired before June 7, 1990, leaving a pending case in which the judge had made discretionary rulings may hear the pending case as a judge pro tempore without having his or her retirement allowance suspended.(3) If a retired judge's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retired judge's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.(4) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.Sec. 402. RCW 6.15.020 and 2011 c 162 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to ensure the well-being of its citizens by protecting retirement income to which they are or may become entitled. For that purpose generally and pursuant to the authority granted to the state of Washington under 11 U.S.C. Sec. 522(b)(2), the exemptions in this section relating to retirement benefits are provided.(2) Unless otherwise provided by federal law, any money received by any citizen of the state of Washington as a pension from the government of the United States, whether the same be in the actual possession of such person or be deposited or loaned, shall be exempt from execution, attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever, and when a debtor dies, or absconds, and leaves his or her family any money exempted by this subsection, the same shall be exempt to the family as provided in this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law.(3) The right of a person to a pension, annuity, or retirement allowance or disability allowance, or death benefits, or any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any citizen of the state of Washington under any employee benefit plan, and any fund created by such a plan or arrangement, shall be exempt from execution, attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever. This subsection shall not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW if otherwise permitted by federal law. This subsection shall permit benefits under any such plan or arrangement to be payable to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant in such plan to the extent expressly provided for in a qualified domestic relations order that meets the requirements for such orders under the plan, or, in the case of benefits payable under a plan described in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 403(b) or 408 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction that provides for maintenance or support. This subsection does not prohibit actions against an employee benefit plan, or fund for valid obligations incurred by the plan or fund for the benefit of the plan or fund.(4) For the purposes of this section, the term "employee benefit plan" means any plan or arrangement that is described in RCW 49.64.020, including any Keogh plan, whether funded by a trust or by an annuity contract, and in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a) or 403(a) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended; or that is a tax-sheltered annuity or a custodial account described in section 403(b) of such code or an individual retirement account or an individual retirement annuity described in section 408 of such code; or a Roth individual retirement account described in section 408A of such code; or a medical savings account or a health savings account described in sections 220 and 223, respectively, of such code; or a retirement bond described in section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984. The term "employee benefit plan" shall not include any employee benefit plan that is established or maintained for its employees by the government of the United States, by the state of Washington under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.32, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW or RCW 41.50.770, or by any agency or instrumentality of the government of the United States.(5) An employee benefit plan shall be deemed to be a spendthrift trust, regardless of the source of funds, the relationship between the trustee or custodian of the plan and the beneficiary, or the ability of the debtor to withdraw or borrow or otherwise become entitled to benefits from the plan before retirement. This subsection shall not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law. This subsection shall permit benefits under any such plan or arrangement to be payable to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant in such plan to the extent expressly provided for in a qualified domestic relations order that meets the requirements for such orders under the plan, or, in the case of benefits payable under a plan described in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 403(b) or 408 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction that provides for maintenance or support.(6) Unless prohibited by federal law, nothing contained in subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section shall be construed as a termination or limitation of a spouse's community property interest in an employee benefit plan held in the name of or on account of the other spouse, who is the participant or the account holder spouse. Unless prohibited by applicable federal law, at the death of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse, the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse may transfer or distribute the community property interest of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse in the participant or account holder spouse's employee benefit plan to the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's estate, testamentary trust, inter vivos trust, or other successor or successors pursuant to the last will of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse or the law of intestate succession, and that distributee may, but shall not be required to, obtain an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, including a nonjudicial binding agreement or order entered under chapter 11.96A RCW, to confirm the distribution. For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, the distributee of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's community property interest in an employee benefit plan shall be considered a person entitled to the full protection of subsection (3) of this section. The nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's consent to a beneficiary designation by the participant or account holder spouse with respect to an employee benefit plan shall not, absent clear and convincing evidence to the contrary, be deemed a release, gift, relinquishment, termination, limitation, or transfer of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's community property interest in an employee benefit plan. For purposes of this subsection, the term "nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse" means the spouse of the person who is a participant in an employee benefit plan or in whose name an individual retirement account is maintained. As used in this subsection, an order of a court of competent jurisdiction entered under chapter 11.96A RCW includes an agreement, as that term is used under RCW 11.96A.220.Sec. 403. RCW 26.09.138 and 1991 c 365 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any obligee of a court order or decree establishing a spousal maintenance obligation may seek a mandatory benefits assignment order under chapter 41.50 RCW if any spousal maintenance payment is more than fifteen days past due and the total of such past due payments is equal to or greater than one hundred dollars, or if the obligor requests a withdrawal of accumulated contributions from the department of retirement systems.(2) Any court order or decree establishing a spousal maintenance obligation may state that, if any spousal maintenance payment is more than fifteen days past due and the total of such past due payments is equal to or greater than one hundred dollars, or if the obligor requests a withdrawal of accumulated contributions from the department of retirement systems, the obligee may seek a mandatory benefits assignment order under chapter 41.50 RCW without prior notice to the obligor. Any such court order or decree may also, or in the alternative, contain a provision that would allow the department to make a direct payment of all or part of a withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to RCW 41.50.550(3). Failure to include this provision does not affect the validity of the court order or decree establishing the spousal maintenance, nor does such failure affect the general applicability of RCW 41.50.500 through 41.50.650 to such obligations.(3) The remedies in RCW 41.50.530 through 41.50.630 are the exclusive provisions of law enforceable against the department of retirement systems in connection with any action for enforcement of a spousal maintenance obligation ordered pursuant to a divorce, dissolution, or legal separation, and no other remedy ordered by a court under this chapter shall be enforceable against the department of retirement systems for collection of spousal maintenance.(4)(a) Nothing in this section regarding mandatory assignment of benefits to enforce a spousal maintenance obligation shall abridge the right of an ex spouse to receive direct payment of retirement benefits payable pursuant to: (i) A court decree of dissolution or legal separation; or (ii) any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement; or (iii) incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation, if such dissolution orders fully comply with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or as applicable, RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, 41.04.310, 41.04.320, 41.04.330, ((41.26.180,))41.26.053, section 310 of this act, 41.32.052, 41.40.052, or 43.43.310 as those statutes existed before July 1, 1987, and as those statutes exist on and after July 28, 1991.(b) Persons whose dissolution orders as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) were entered between July 1, 1987, and July 28, 1991, shall be entitled to receive direct payments of retirement benefits to satisfy court-ordered property divisions if the dissolution orders filed with the department comply or are amended to comply with RCW 41.50.670 through 41.50.720 and, as applicable, RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, ((41.26.180,))41.26.053, section 310 of this act, 41.32.052, 41.40.052, or 43.43.310.Sec. 404. RCW 28B.15.380 and 2019 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall exempt the following students from the payment of all tuition fees and services and activities fees:(1) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), or 41.24 RCW, highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire department in this state, or was a highway worker while either employed by a general contractor or subcontractor, on a transportation project or employed by a transportation agency: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the exemption only if they begin their course of study at a state-supported college or university within ten years of their graduation from high school; and(2) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), or 41.24 RCW, highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire department in this state, or was a highway worker while either employed by a general contractor or subcontractor, on a transportation project or employed by a transportation agency.(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall report to the education data center on the annual cost of tuition fees and services and activities fees waived for surviving spouses and children under this section. The education data center shall consolidate the reports of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature.(4) As used in this section, "transportation agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government in this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the construction and maintenance of the highways and roads within the state of Washington. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a transit agency having as one of its functions the highway maintenance, including but not limited to the state department of transportation. A transportation agency under this section does not include a government contractor.Sec. 405. RCW 28B.15.520 and 2025 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the community and technical colleges:(1) May waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and activities fees for students who are eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 through 28B.15.015, who enroll in a course of study or program which will enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate, but who are not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405;(2)(a) Shall waive all of tuition fees and services and activities fees for:(i) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), or 41.24 RCW, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this state: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the waiver only if they begin their course of study at a community or technical college within ten years of their graduation from high school; and(ii) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), or 41.24 RCW, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this state.(b) For the purposes of this section, "totally disabled" means a person who has become totally and permanently disabled for life by bodily injury or disease, and is thereby prevented from performing any occupation or gainful pursuit.(c) The governing boards of the community and technical colleges shall report to the state board for community and technical colleges on the annual cost of tuition fees and services and activities fees waived for surviving spouses and children under (a) of this subsection. The state board for community and technical colleges shall consolidate the reports of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature; and(3) May waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential for:(a) Nonresident students enrolled in a community or technical college course of study or program which will enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate but who are not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405. The waiver shall be in effect only for those courses which lead to a high school diploma or certificate; and(b) Up to forty percent of the students enrolled in the regional education program for deaf students, subject to federal funding of such program.Sec. 406. RCW 35.21.935 and 2015 c 288 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any city or town may establish the position of warrant officer.(2) If any city or town establishes the position of warrant officer, the position shall be maintained by the city or town within the city or town police department. The number and qualifications of warrant officers shall be fixed by ordinance and their compensation shall be paid by the city or town. The chief of police of the city or town must establish training requirements consistent with the job description of warrant officer established in that city or town. Training requirements must be approved by the criminal justice training commission.(3) Warrant officers shall be vested only with the special authority identified in ordinance, which may include the authority to make arrests authorized by warrants and other authority related to service of civil and criminal process.(4) Process issuing from any court that is directed to a police department in which a warrant officer position is maintained may be served or enforced by the warrant officer, if within the warrant officer's authority as identified in ordinance.(5) Warrant officers shall not be entitled to death, disability, or retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW on the basis of service as a warrant officer as described in this section.Sec. 407. RCW 35A.21.380 and 2015 c 288 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any code city may establish the position of warrant officer.(2) If any code city establishes the position of warrant officer, the position shall be maintained by the city within the city police department. The number and qualifications of warrant officers shall be fixed by ordinance, and their compensation shall be paid by the city. The chief of police of the city must establish training requirements consistent with the job description of warrant officer established in that city. Training requirements must be approved by the criminal justice training commission.(3) Warrant officers shall be vested only with the special authority identified in ordinance, which may include the authority to make arrests authorized by warrants and other authority related to service of civil and criminal process.(4) Process issuing from any court that is directed to a police department in which a warrant officer position is maintained may be served or enforced by the warrant officer, if within the warrant officer's authority as identified in ordinance.(5) Warrant officers shall not be entitled to death, disability, or retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW on the basis of service as a warrant officer as described in this section.Sec. 408. RCW 36.28A.010 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 172 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs is hereby declared to be a combination of units of local government: PROVIDED, That such association shall not be considered an "employer" within the meaning of RCW 41.26.030(((2))), section 303 of this act, or 41.40.010(((4))): PROVIDED FURTHER, That no compensation received as an employee of the association shall be considered salary for purposes of the provisions of any retirement system created pursuant to the general laws of this state: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such association shall not qualify for inclusion under the unallocated two mills of the property tax of any political subdivision: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the association shall not have the authority to assess any excess levy or bond measure.Sec. 409. RCW 41.04.205 and 2018 c 260 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 41.04.180, the employees, with their dependents, of any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state shall be eligible to participate in any insurance or self-insurance program for employees administered under chapter 41.05 RCW if the legislative authority of any such county, municipality, or other political subdivisions of this state determines, subject to collective bargaining under applicable statutes, a transfer to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under chapter 41.05 RCW should be made. In the event of a special district employee transfer pursuant to this section, members of the governing authority shall be eligible to be included in such transfer if such members are authorized by law as of June 25, 1976 to participate in the insurance program being transferred from and subject to payment by such members of all costs of insurance for members.(2) When the legislative authority of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision determines to so transfer, the state health care authority shall:(a) Establish the conditions for participation; and(b) Have the sole right to reject the application, except a group application from a county or other political subdivision of the state with fewer than five thousand employees must be approved.Approval of the application by the state health care authority shall effect a transfer of the employees involved to the insurance, self-insurance, or health care program applied for.(3) Any application of this section to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW is subject to chapter 41.56 RCW.(4) Until December 31, 2019, school districts may voluntarily transfer to the public employees' benefits board, except that all eligible employees in a bargaining unit of a school district may transfer only as a unit and all nonrepresented employees in a district may transfer only as a unit.Sec. 410. RCW 41.04.270 and 2006 c 309 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.28, 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW, on and after March 19, 1976, any member or former member who (a) receives a retirement allowance earned by the former member as deferred compensation from any public retirement system authorized by the general laws of this state, or (b) is eligible to receive a retirement allowance from any public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030, but chooses not to apply, or (c) is the beneficiary of a disability allowance from any public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030 shall be estopped from becoming a member of or accruing any contractual rights whatsoever in any other public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030: PROVIDED, That (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not apply to persons who have accumulated less than fifteen years service credit in any such system.(2) Nothing in this section is intended to apply to any retirement system except those listed in RCW 41.50.030 and the city employee retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma, and Spokane. Subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply to a dual member as defined in RCW 41.54.010.Sec. 411. RCW 41.04.350 and 1979 ex.s. c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no employee of the state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions or any institution supported in total or in part by the state or any of its political subdivisions, other than employees covered by chapters 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), and 43.43 RCW, shall be compelled to retire solely on the basis of age prior to attaining seventy years of age.(2) All compulsory retirement provisions relating to public employees, other than employees covered by chapters 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), and 43.43 RCW, may be waived for individuals attaining seventy years of age by the individual's employer.Sec. 412. RCW 41.04.393 and 2006 c 309 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:Retirement benefits paid under chapter 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW to beneficiaries of public safety officers who die in the line of duty shall be paid in accordance with Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 101(h) as amended by the Fallen Hero Survivor Benefit Fairness Act of 2001.Sec. 413. RCW 41.04.400 and 1984 c 184 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:It is the purpose of RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 to govern the retirement rights of persons whose employment status is altered when: (1) Two or more units of local government of this state, at least one of which is a first-class city with its own retirement system, enter into an agreement for the consolidated performance of a governmental service, activity, or undertaking; (2) the service, activity, or undertaking is to be performed either by one of the participating local governmental units or by a newly established separate legal entity; and (3) the employees of the participating local governmental units are not all members of the same Washington public retirement system.RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 are not intended to and do not govern retirement rights of any members of the retirement systems established by chapter 41.16, 41.18, 41.20, ((or)) 41.26, or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW, or of employees described in RCW 35.58.265, 35.58.390, or 70.08.070. To the extent there is any conflict between RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 and RCW 41.04.110, the provisions of RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 shall govern.Sec. 414. RCW 41.04.440 and 2007 c 492 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The sole purpose of RCW 41.04.445 and 41.04.450 is to allow the members of the retirement systems created in chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, 41.34, and 43.43 RCW to enjoy the tax deferral benefits allowed under 26 U.S.C. 414(h). Chapter 227, Laws of 1984 does not alter in any manner the provisions of RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 which require that the member contribution rates shall be set so as to provide fifty percent of the cost of the respective retirement plans.(2) Should the legislature revoke any benefit allowed under 26 U.S.C. 414(h), no affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such benefit as a matter of contractual right.Sec. 415. RCW 41.04.450 and 2007 c 492 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Employers of those members under chapters 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, and 41.40 RCW who are not specified in RCW 41.04.445 may choose to implement the employer pick up of all member contributions without exception under RCW ((41.26.080(1)(a),)) 41.26.450, section 316(1)(a) of this act, 41.40.330(1), 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 and chapter 41.34 RCW. If the employer does so choose, the employer and members shall be subject to the conditions and limitations of RCW 41.04.445 (3), (4), and (5) and 41.04.455.(2) An employer exercising the option under this section may later choose to withdraw from and/or reestablish the employer pick up of member contributions only once in a calendar year following forty-five days prior notice to the director of the department of retirement systems.Sec. 416. RCW 41.04.803 and 2012 c 236 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Chapter 236, Laws of 2012 is curative and remedial and is applicable to any future determination of eligibility for membership in a retirement system under chapters 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, and 41.40 RCW.(2) Chapter 236, Laws of 2012 does not apply to or contravene any prior final decision of the state supreme court regarding the interpretation of the statutes addressed in chapter 236, Laws of 2012.Sec. 417. RCW 41.05.011 and 2023 c 164 s 1, 2023 c 51 s 3, and 2023 c 13 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.(2) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.055 and the school employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.740.(3) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan whereby employees and school employees may pay for certain employment related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or other sections of the internal revenue code.(4) "Director" means the director of the authority.(5) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.(6)(a) "Employee" for the public employees' benefits board program includes all employees of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature. Pursuant to contractual agreement with the authority, "employee" may also include: (i) Employees of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state and members of the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after February 20, 1970, if the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state submits application materials to the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (ii) employees of employee organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option of each such employee organization; (iii) through December 31, 2019, employees of a school district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350; (iv) employees of a tribal government, if the governing body of the tribal government seeks and receives the approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and (g); (v) employees of the Washington health benefit exchange if the governing board of the exchange established in RCW 43.71.020 seeks and receives approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (g) and (n); and (vi) through December 31, 2019, employees of a charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW. "Employee" does not include: Adult family home providers; unpaid volunteers; patients of state hospitals; inmates; students of institutions of higher education as determined by their institution; and any others not expressly defined as employees under this chapter or by the authority under this chapter.(b) Effective January 1, 2020, "school employee" for the school employees' benefits board program includes:(i) All employees of school districts and charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW;(ii) Represented employees of educational service districts;(iii) Effective January 1, 2024, all employees of educational service districts; and(iv) Effective January 1, 2024, pursuant to contractual agreement with the authority, "school employee" may also include: (A) Employees of employee organizations representing school employees, at the option of each such employee organization; and (B) employees of a tribal school as defined in RCW 28A.715.010, if the governing body of the tribal school seeks and receives the approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and (g).(7) "Employee group" means employees of a similar employment type, such as administrative, represented classified, nonrepresented classified excluding such employees in educational service districts until December 31, 2023, confidential, represented certificated, or nonrepresented certificated excluding such employees in educational service districts until December 31, 2023, within a school employees' benefits board organization.(8)(a) "Employer" for the public employees' benefits board program means the state of Washington.(b) "Employer" for the school employees' benefits board program means school districts and educational service districts and charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW.(9)(a) "Employer group" for the public employees' benefits board program means those counties, municipalities, political subdivisions, the Washington health benefit exchange, tribal governments, and employee organizations representing state civil service employees obtaining employee benefits through a contractual agreement with the authority to participate in benefit plans developed by the public employees' benefits board.(b) "Employer group" for the school employees' benefits board program means an employee organization representing school employees and a tribal school as defined in RCW 28A.715.010, obtaining employee benefits through a contractual agreement with the authority to participate in benefit plans developed by the school employees' benefits board.(10)(a) "Employing agency" for the public employees' benefits board program means a division, department, or separate agency of state government, including an institution of higher education; a county, municipality, or other political subdivision; and a tribal government covered by this chapter.(b) "Employing agency" for the school employees' benefits board program means school districts, educational service districts, and charter schools.(11) "Faculty" means an academic employee of an institution of higher education whose workload is not defined by work hours but whose appointment, workload, and duties directly serve the institution's academic mission, as determined under the authority of its enabling statutes, its governing body, and any applicable collective bargaining agreement.(12) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows public employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee or school employee contributions from among a range of choices offered by the authority.(13) "Flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan whereby public employees may reduce their salary before taxes to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.(14) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.(15) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction plan.(16) "Plan year" means the time period established by the authority.(17) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby public employees may pay their share of group health plan premiums with pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.(18) "Public employee" has the same meaning as employee and school employee.(19) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district, educational service district, or charter school on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district, educational service district, or charter school due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.(20) "Salary" means a public employee's monthly salary or wages.(21) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis to participate in the dependent care assistance program, flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.(22) "School employees' benefits board organization" means a public school district or educational service district or charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW that is required to participate in benefit plans provided by the school employees' benefits board.(23) "School year" means school year as defined in RCW 28A.150.203(11).(24) "Seasonal employee" means a state employee hired to work during a recurring, annual season with a duration of three months or more, and anticipated to return each season to perform similar work.(25) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from employment with an employer as defined in:(a)(i) RCW 41.32.010(17) on or after July 1, 1996; or(ii) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or(iii) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(33), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010; or(b) For the purposes of RCW 41.05.080:(i) RCW 41.32.010 on or after January 1, 2024; or(ii) RCW 41.35.010 on or after January 1, 2024; or(iii) RCW 41.40.010 on or after January 1, 2024; and who are at least age 55 and have at least 20 years of service under the teachers' retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.32.010, the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.(26) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical and behavioral health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with state and federal funds by the department of social and health services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and local school districts.(27) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal government, that has government offices principally located in this state.Sec. 418. RCW 41.05.320 and 2023 c 51 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Elected officials and permanent employees and school employees are eligible to participate in the salary reduction plan and reduce their salary by agreement with the authority. The authority may adopt rules to: (a) Limit the participation of employing agencies and their employees in the plan; and (b) permit participation in the plan by temporary employees and school employees.(2) Persons eligible under subsection (1) of this section may enter into salary reduction agreements with the state.(3)(a) An eligible person may become a participant of the salary reduction plan for a full plan year with annual benefit plan selection for each new plan year made before the beginning of the plan year, as determined by the authority, or upon becoming eligible.(b) Once an eligible person elects to participate in the salary reduction plan and determines the amount his or her gross salary shall be reduced and the benefit plan for which the funds are to be used during the plan year, the agreement shall be irrevocable and may not be amended during the plan year except as provided in (c) of this subsection. Prior to making an election to participate in the salary reduction plan, the eligible person shall be informed in writing of all the benefits and reductions that will occur as a result of such election.(c) The authority shall provide in the salary reduction plan that a participant may enroll, terminate, or change his or her election after the plan year has begun if there is a significant change in a participant's status, as provided by 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 and the regulations adopted under that section and defined by the authority.(4) The authority shall establish as part of the salary reduction plan the procedures for and effect of withdrawal from the plan by reason of retirement, death, leave of absence, or termination of employment. To the extent possible under federal law, the authority shall protect participants from forfeiture of rights under the plan.(5) Any reduction of salary under the salary reduction plan shall not reduce the reportable compensation for the purpose of computing the state retirement and pension benefits earned by the public employee pursuant to chapters 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, and 43.43 RCW.Sec. 419. RCW 41.16.020 and 2020 c 107 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is hereby created in each city and town a municipal firefighters' pension board to consist of the following five members, ex officio, the mayor, or in a city of the first class, the mayor or a designated representative who shall be an elected official of the city, who shall be chairperson of the board, the city comptroller or clerk, the chairperson of finance of the city council, or if there is no chairperson of finance, the city treasurer, and in addition, two regularly employed or retired firefighters elected by secret ballot of those employed and retired firefighters who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board. The members to be elected by the firefighters shall be elected annually for a two year term. The two firefighters elected as members shall, in turn, select a third eligible member who shall serve as an alternate in the event of an absence of one of the regularly elected members. In case a vacancy occurs in the membership of the firefighters or retired members, the members shall in the same manner elect a successor to serve the unexpired term. The board may select and appoint a secretary who may, but need not be, a member of the board. In case of absence or inability of the chairperson to act, the board may select a chairperson pro tempore who shall during such absence or inability perform the duties and exercise the powers of the chairperson. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum and have power to transact business.(2) If no eligible regularly employed or retired firefighters are willing or able to be elected to the board under subsection (1) of this section, then the following individuals may be elected to the board under subsection (1) of this section:(a) Any active or retired firefighters who reside within the jurisdiction served by the board. This includes active and retired firefighters under this chapter and chapters 41.18, 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), and 52.26 RCW;(b) The widow or widower of a firefighter subject to the jurisdiction of the board.Sec. 420. RCW 41.16.060 and 2019 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is the duty of the legislative authority of each municipality, each year as a part of its annual tax levy, to levy and place in the fund a tax of twenty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against all the taxable property of such municipality: PROVIDED, That if a report by a qualified actuary on the condition of the fund establishes that the whole or any part of said dollar rate is not necessary to maintain the actuarial soundness of the fund, the levy of said twenty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value may be omitted, or the whole or any part of such dollar rate may be levied and used for any other municipal purpose.(2) It is the duty of the legislative authority of each municipality, each year as a part of its annual tax levy and in addition to the city levy limit set forth in RCW 84.52.043, to levy and place in the fund an additional tax of twenty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against all taxable property of such municipality: PROVIDED, That if a report by a qualified actuary establishes that all or any part of the additional twenty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value levy is unnecessary to meet the estimated demands on the fund under this chapter for the ensuing budget year, the levy of said additional twenty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value may be omitted, or the whole or any part of such dollar rate may be levied and used for any other municipal purpose, subject to subsection (4) of this section: PROVIDED FURTHER, That cities that have annexed to library districts according to RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.395 and/or fire protection districts according to RCW 52.04.061 through 52.04.081 may not levy this additional tax to the extent that it causes the combined levies to exceed the statutory or constitutional limits.(3) The amount of a levy under this section allocated to the pension fund may be reduced in the same proportion as the regular property tax levy of the municipality is reduced by chapter 84.55 RCW.(4) If a municipality no longer has any beneficiaries receiving benefits under this chapter, the whole or any part of such additional levy under subsection (2) of this section may continue to be levied for the payment of benefits provided under ((RCW 41.26.150(1)))section 327(1) of this act or other municipal purpose until such time that the municipality no longer has any beneficiaries receiving benefits under ((RCW 41.26.150(1)))section 327(1) of this act, however the proceeds of the additional levy must be annually expended for payment of benefits provided under ((RCW 41.26.150(1)))section 327(1) of this act prior to being spent for any other purpose.Sec. 421. RCW 41.16.145 and 2007 c 218 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:The amount of all benefits payable under the provisions of RCW 41.16.080, 41.16.120, 41.16.130, 41.16.140 and 41.16.230 shall be increased annually as hereafter in this section provided. The local pension board shall meet subsequent to March 31st but prior to June 30th of each year for the purposes of adjusting benefit allowances payable pursuant to the aforementioned sections. The local board shall determine the increase in the consumer price index between January 1st and December 31st of the previous year and increase in dollar amount the benefits payable subsequent to July 1st of the year in which said board makes such determination by a dollar amount proportionate to the increase in the consumer price index: PROVIDED, That regardless of the change in the consumer price index, such increase shall be at least two percent each year such adjustment is made.Each year effective with the July payment all benefits specified herein, shall be increased by this section. This benefit increase shall be paid monthly as part of the regular pension payment and shall be cumulative. The increased benefits authorized by this section shall not affect any benefit payable under the provisions of this chapter (( 41.16 RCW)) in which the benefit payment is attached to a current salary of the rank held at time of retirement. A beneficiary of benefit increases provided for pursuant to this section is hereby authorized to appeal a decision on such increases or the failure of the local pension board to order such increased benefits or the amount of such benefits to the ((Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system retirement board provided for in RCW 41.26.050))director of retirement systems.For the purpose of this section the term "consumer price index" shall mean, for any calendar year, the consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.Sec. 422. RCW 41.18.015 and 2020 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is hereby created in each fire protection district which qualifies under this chapter, a firefighters' pension board to consist of the following five members, the chairperson of the fire commissioners for said district who shall be chairperson of the board, the county auditor, county treasurer, and in addition, two regularly employed or retired firefighters elected by secret ballot of the employed and retired firefighters. Retired members who are subject to the jurisdiction of the pension board have both the right to elect and the right to be elected under this section. The first members to be elected by the firefighters shall be elected annually for a two-year term. The two firefighter elected members shall, in turn, select a third eligible member who shall serve in the event of an absence of one of the regularly elected members. In case a vacancy occurs in the membership of the firefighter or retired members, the members shall in the same manner elect a successor to serve the unexpired term. The board may select and appoint a secretary who may, but need not be a member of the board. In case of absence or inability of the chairperson to act, the board may select a chairperson pro tempore who shall during such absence or inability perform the duties and exercise the powers of the chairperson. A majority of the members of said board shall constitute a quorum and have power to transact business.(2) If no eligible regularly employed or retired firefighters are willing or able to be elected to the board under subsection (1) of this section, then the following individuals may be elected to the board under subsection (1) of this section:(a) Any active or retired firefighters who reside within the jurisdiction served by the board. This includes active and retired firefighters under this chapter and chapters 41.16, 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), and 52.26 RCW;(b) The widow or widower of a firefighter subject to the jurisdiction of the board.Sec. 423. RCW 41.18.104 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 44 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The amount of all benefits payable under the provisions of RCW 41.18.040, 41.18.080, 41.18.100 and 41.18.200 as now or hereafter amended, shall be increased annually as hereafter in this section provided. The local pension board shall meet subsequent to March 31st but prior to June 30th of each year for the purpose of adjusting benefit allowances payable pursuant to the aforementioned sections. The local board shall determine the increase in the consumer price index between January 1st and December 31st of the previous year and increase in dollar amount the benefits payable subsequent to July 1st of the year in which said board makes such determination by a dollar amount proportionate to the increase in the consumer price index: PROVIDED, That regardless of the change in the consumer price index, such increase shall be at least two percent each year such adjustment is made.Each year effective with the July payment all benefits specified herein, shall be increased as authorized by this section. This benefit increase shall be paid monthly as part of the regular pension payment and shall be cumulative. The increased benefits authorized by this section shall not affect any benefit payable under the provisions of chapter 41.18 RCW in which the benefit payment is attached to a current salary of the rank held at time of retirement. A beneficiary of benefit increases provided for pursuant to this section is hereby authorized to appeal a decision on such increases or the failure of the local pension board to order such increased benefits or the amount of such benefits to the ((Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system retirement board provided for in RCW 41.26.050))director of retirement systems.For the purpose of this section the term"Consumer price index" shall mean, for any calendar year, the consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.Sec. 424. RCW 41.18.210 and 2007 c 218 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:Any former employee of a department of a city of the first class, who (1) was a member of the employees' retirement system of such city, and (2) is now employed within the fire department of such city, may transfer his or her former membership credit from the city employees' retirement system to the firefighter's pension system created by this chapter and chapter((s)) 41.16 ((and 41.18)) RCW by filing a written request with the board of administration and the municipal firefighters' pension board, respectively.Upon the receipt of such request, the transfer of membership to the city's firefighter's pension system shall be made, together with a transfer of all accumulated contributions credited to such member. The board of administration shall transmit to the municipal firefighters' pension board a record of service credited to such member which shall be computed and credited to such member as a part of his or her period of employment in the city's firefighter's pension system. For the purpose of the transfer contemplated by this section, those affected individuals who have formerly withdrawn funds from the city employees' retirement system shall be allowed to restore contributions withdrawn from that retirement system directly to the firefighter's pension system and receive credit in the firefighter's pension system for their former membership service in the prior system.Any employee so transferring shall have all the rights, benefits, and privileges that he or she would have been entitled to had he or she been a member of the city's firefighter's pension system from the beginning of his or her employment with the city.No person so transferring shall thereafter be entitled to any other public pension, except that provided by chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW or social security, which is based upon such service with the city.The right of any employee to file a written request for transfer of membership as set forth in this section shall expire December 31, 1974.Sec. 425. RCW 41.20.010 and 2020 c 107 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The mayor or his or her designated representative who shall be an elected official of the city, and the clerk, treasurer, president of the city council or mayor pro tem of each city of the first class, or in case any such city has no city council, the commissioner who has supervision of the police department, together with three active or retired members of the police department, to be elected as herein provided, in addition to the duties now required of them, are constituted a board of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police department of each such city, and shall provide for the disbursement of the fund, and designate the beneficiaries thereof.(2) The police department and the retired law enforcement officers of each city of the first class shall elect three members to act as members of the board. Members shall be elected for three year terms. Existing members shall continue in office until replaced as provided for in this section.(3) Such election shall be held in the following manner. Not more than thirty nor less than fifteen days preceding the first day of June in each year, written notice of the nomination of any member or retired member of the department for membership on the board may be filed with the secretary of the board. Each notice of nomination shall be signed by not less than five members or retired members of the department, and nothing herein contained shall prevent any member or retired member of the department from signing more than one notice of nomination. The election shall be held on a date to be fixed by the secretary during the month of June. Notice of the dates upon which notice of nomination may be filed and of the date fixed for the election of such members of the board shall be given by the secretary of the board by posting written notices thereof in a prominent place in the police headquarters. For the purpose of such election, the secretary of the board shall prepare and furnish printed or typewritten ballots in the usual form, containing the names of all persons regularly nominated for membership and shall furnish a ballot box for the election. Each member and each retired member of the police department shall be entitled to vote at the election for one nominee as a member of the board. The chief of the department shall appoint two members to act as officials of the election, who shall be allowed their regular wages for the day, but shall receive no additional compensation therefor. The election shall be held in the police headquarters of the department and the polls shall open at 7:30 a.m. and close at 8:30 p.m. The one nominee receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected to the board and his or her term shall commence on the first day of July succeeding the election. In the first election the nominee receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to the three year term, the second greatest to the two year term and the third greatest to the one year term. Retired members who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have both the right to elect and the right to be elected under this section. Ballots shall contain all names of those nominated, both active and retired. Notice of nomination and voting by retired members shall be conducted by the board.(4) If no eligible active or retired members of the police department are willing or able to be elected to the board under subsection (3) of this section, then the following individuals may be elected to the board under subsection (3) of this section:(a) Any active or retired law enforcement officers who reside within the jurisdiction served by the board. This includes active and retired law enforcement officers under this chapter and chapters 41.26 and 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW;(b) The widow or widower of a law enforcement officer subject to the jurisdiction of the board.Sec. 426. RCW 41.20.170 and 2012 c 117 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:Any former employee of a department of a city of the first class who (1) was a member of the employees' retirement system of such city, and (2) is now employed within the police department of such city, may transfer his or her membership from the city employees' retirement system to the city's police relief and pension fund system by filing a written request with the board of administration and the board of trustees, respectively, of the two systems.Upon the receipt of such request, the transfer of membership to the city's police relief and pension fund system shall be made, together with a transfer of all accumulated contributions credited to such member. The board of administration of the city's employees' retirement system shall transmit to the board of trustees of the city's police relief and pension fund system a record of service credited to such member which shall be computed and credited to such member as a part of his or her period of employment in the city's police relief and pension fund system. For the purpose of the transfer contemplated by this section, the affected individuals shall be allowed to restore withdrawn contributions to the city employees' retirement system and reinstate their membership service records.Any employee so transferring shall have all the rights, benefits and privileges that he or she would have been entitled to had he or she been a member of the city's police relief and pension fund system from the beginning of his or her employment with the city.No person so transferring shall thereafter be entitled to any other public pension, except that provided by chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW or social security, which is based upon service with the city.The right of any employee to file a written request for transfer of membership as set forth herein shall expire December 31, 1973.Sec. 427. RCW 41.20.175 and 2012 c 117 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:A former employee of a fire department of a city of the first class who (1) was a member of the firefighters' pension system created by chapter((s)) 41.16 or 41.18 RCW, and (2) is now employed within the police department of such city, will be regarded as having received membership service credit for such service to the fire department in the city's police and relief pension system at the time he or she recovers such service credit by paying withdrawn contributions to the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.26.030(((28)))(25) or section 303(29) of this act.Sec. 428. RCW 41.24.400 and 2007 c 492 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any municipality may make provision by appropriate legislation and payment of fees required by RCW 41.24.030(((1)))(2) solely for the purpose of enabling any reserve officer to enroll under the retirement pension provisions of this chapter or fees required under RCW 41.24.030(((1)))(2) to pay for the costs of extending the relief provisions of this chapter to its reserve officers.(2) A reserve officer is not eligible to receive a benefit under the retirement provisions of this chapter for service under chapter 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, or 41.40 RCW.(3) Every municipality shall make provisions for the collection and payment of the fees required under this chapter, and shall continue to make provisions for all reserve officers who come under this chapter as long as they continue to be employed as reserve officers.(4) Except as provided under RCW 41.24.450, a reserve officer is not eligible to receive a benefit under the relief provisions of this chapter.Sec. 429. RCW 41.32.800 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.32.802, no retiree under the provisions of plan 2 shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.37.010, or 41.35.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400.If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.(2) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.Sec. 430. RCW 41.32.802 and 2025 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.(2)(a) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section, may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without suspension of his or her benefit.(b)(i) Between March 23, 2022, and January 1, 2030, a retiree who reenters employment more than one month after his or her accrual date, and who enters service in a school district in a nonadministrative position shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year.(ii) Between March 23, 2022, and January 1, 2030, a retiree that retired before January 1, 2022, and who enters service in a second-class school district, as defined in RCW 28A.300.065, as either a district superintendent or an in-school administrator shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year.(iii) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this subsection (2)(b) in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than 867 hours in a calendar year without a reduction of his or her pension.(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW 41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire if eligible.Sec. 431. RCW 41.32.860 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except under RCW 41.32.862, no retiree shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.37.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400.(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused the suspension of benefits. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.Sec. 432. RCW 41.32.862 and 2025 c 284 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.(2)(a) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section, may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without suspension of his or her benefit.(b)(i) Between March 23, 2022, and January 1, 2030, a retired teacher or retired administrator who reenters employment more than one month after his or her accrual date, and who enters service in a school district in a nonadministrative position shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year.(ii) Between March 23, 2022, and January 1, 2030, a retiree that retired before January 1, 2022, and who enters service in a second-class school district, as defined in RCW 28A.300.065, as either a district superintendent or an in-school administrator shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year.(iii) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this subsection (2)(b) in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than 867 hours in a calendar year without a reduction of his or her pension.(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW 41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire if eligible.Sec. 433. RCW 41.35.060 and 2025 c 284 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.(2)(a) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without suspension of his or her benefit.(b) Between March 23, 2022, and January 1, 2030, a retiree, including a retiree who has retired under the alternate early retirement provisions of RCW 41.35.420(3)(b) or 41.35.680(3)(b), who reenters employment more than one month after his or her accrual date, and who enters service in a school district in a nonadministrative position shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year. The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this subsection (2)(b) in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than 867 hours in a calendar year without a reduction of his or her pension.(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW 41.35.030, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.35.420 or 41.35.680. However, if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement shall be reinstated.Sec. 434. RCW 41.35.230 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.35.060, no retiree under the provisions of plan 2 shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.35.010, 41.40.010, 41.37.010, or 41.32.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, except that a retiree who ends his or her membership in the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is not subject to this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective official.(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.Sec. 435. RCW 41.37.050 and 2023 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment in an eligible position with an employer as defined in this chapter sooner than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.(b) If a retiree enters employment in an eligible position with an employer as defined in chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW sooner than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.(c) The benefit reduction provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.(2)(a) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without suspension of his or her benefit.(b) Between April 14, 2023, and July 1, 2026, a retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section, and who enters service in a nonadministrative position as a licensed nurse for a state agency, shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year.(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under this chapter, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire if eligible in accordance with this chapter. However, if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement shall be reinstated.(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the use of this section for the select committee on pension policy.Sec. 436. RCW 41.37.180 and 2004 c 242 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.37.050, a retiree shall not be eligible to receive the retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.37.010, or RCW 41.35.010, 41.40.010, or 41.32.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, except that a retiree who ends his or her membership in the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.37.020(2)(b) is not subject to this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective official.(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.Sec. 437. RCW 41.40.010 and 2024 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest thereon.(2) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be adopted by the director.(3) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.(4) "Annual increase" means, initially, 59 cents per month per year of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.(5) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly installments.(6)(a) "Average final compensation" for plan 1 members, means the annual average of the greatest compensation earnable by a member during any consecutive two year period of service credit months for which service credit is allowed; or if the member has less than two years of service credit months then the annual average compensation earnable during the total years of service for which service credit is allowed.(b) "Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the member's average compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2) or (c) of this subsection.(c) In calculating average final compensation under this subsection for a member of plan 1, 2, or 3, the department of retirement systems shall include:(i) Any compensation forgone by the member during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, voluntary leave without pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary furloughs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer;(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or a local government during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases; and(iii) Any compensation forgone by a member during the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, furloughs, reductions to current pay, or other similar measures resulting from the COVID-19 budgetary crisis, if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases.(7)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance, pension or other benefit provided by this chapter.(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.(8)(a) "Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members, means salaries or wages earned during a payroll period for personal services and where the compensation is not all paid in money, maintenance compensation shall be included upon the basis of the schedules established by the member's employer.(i) "Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members also includes the following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:(A) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be considered compensation earnable and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;(B) If a leave of absence is taken by an individual for the purpose of serving in the state legislature, the salary which would have been received for the position from which the leave of absence was taken, shall be considered as compensation earnable if the employee's contribution is paid by the employee and the employer's contribution is paid by the employer or employee;(C) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;(D) Compensation that a member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;(E) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and(F) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not arise.(ii) "Compensation earnable" does not include:(A) Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;(B) Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of 240 hours.(b) "Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay."Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be considered compensation earnable to the extent provided above, and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the member shall have the option of having such member's compensation earnable be the greater of:(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature; or(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not arise.(9) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.(10) "Director" means the director of the department.(11) "Eligible position" means:(a) Any position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more months of service a year for which regular compensation for at least seventy hours is earned by the occupant thereof. For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define "position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one position;(b) Any position occupied by an elected official or person appointed directly by the governor, or appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court under RCW 2.04.240(2) or 2.06.150(2), for which compensation is paid.(12) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.(13)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means every branch, department, agency, commission, board, and office of the state, any political subdivision or association of political subdivisions of the state admitted into the retirement system, and legal entities authorized by RCW 35.63.070 and 36.70.060 or chapter 39.34 RCW; and the term shall also include any labor guild, association, or organization the membership of a local lodge or division of which is comprised of at least forty percent employees of an employer (other than such labor guild, association, or organization) within this chapter. The term may also include any city of the first class that has its own retirement system.(b) "Employer" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means every branch, department, agency, commission, board, and office of the state, and any political subdivision and municipal corporation of the state admitted into the retirement system, including public agencies created pursuant to RCW 35.63.070, 36.70.060, and 39.34.030; except that after August 31, 2000, school districts and educational service districts will no longer be employers for the public employees' retirement system plan 2.(c) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an "employer." The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an "employer," but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an "employer" under this chapter.(d) "Employer" does not include a comprehensive cancer center participating in a collaborative arrangement as defined in RCW 28B.10.930 that is operated in conformance with RCW 28B.10.930.(14) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.(15) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.(16) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a postretirement adjustment.(17) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.(18) "Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than 60 percent of index A.(19) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (11) of this section.(20) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being separated from membership.(21) "Member" means any employee included in the membership of the retirement system, as provided for in RCW 41.40.023. ((RCW 41.26.045))Section 306 of this act does not prohibit a person otherwise eligible for membership in the retirement system from establishing such membership effective when he or she first entered an eligible position.(22) "Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined contribution portion of plan 3.(23) "Membership service" means:(a) All service rendered, as a member, after October 1, 1947;(b) All service after October 1, 1947, to any employer prior to the time of its admission into the retirement system for which member and employer contributions, plus interest as required by RCW 41.50.125, have been paid under RCW 41.40.056 or 41.40.057;(c) Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary service rendered after April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a member, in the case of any member, upon payment in full by such member of the total amount of the employer's contribution to the retirement fund which would have been required under the law in effect when such probationary service was rendered if the member had been a member during such period, except that the amount of the employer's contribution shall be calculated by the director based on the first month's compensation earnable as a member;(d) Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary service, rendered after October 1, 1947, and before April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a member, in the case of any member, upon payment in full by such member of five percent of such member's salary during said period of probationary service, except that the amount of the employer's contribution shall be calculated by the director based on the first month's compensation earnable as a member.(24) "New member" means a person who becomes a member on or after April 1, 1949, except as otherwise provided in this section.(25) "Original member" of this retirement system means:(a) Any person who became a member of the system prior to April 1, 1949;(b) Any person who becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the retirement system on and after April 1, 1949, and prior to April 1, 1951;(c) Any person who first becomes a member by securing employment with an employer prior to April 1, 1951, provided the member has rendered at least one or more years of service to any employer prior to October 1, 1947;(d) Any person who first becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the retirement system on or after April 1, 1951, provided, such person has been in the regular employ of the employer for at least six months of the 12-month period preceding the said admission date;(e) Any member who has restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's retirement becomes entitled to be credited with 10 years or more of membership service except that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for the member upon retirement at age 70 as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall not apply to the member;(f) Any member who has been a contributor under the system for two or more years and who has restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's retirement has rendered five or more years of service for the state or any political subdivision prior to the time of the admission of the employer into the system; except that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for the member upon retirement at age 70 as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall not apply to the member.(26) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly installments.(27) "Plan 1" means the public employees' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.(28) "Plan 2" means the public employees' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977, and are not included in plan 3.(29) "Plan 3" means the public employees' retirement system, plan 3 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who:(a) First become a member on or after:(i) March 1, 2002, and are employed by a state agency or institute of higher education and who did not choose to enter plan 2; or(ii) September 1, 2002, and are employed by other than a state agency or institute of higher education and who did not choose to enter plan 2; or(b) Transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795.(30) "Prior service" means all service of an original member rendered to any employer prior to October 1, 1947.(31) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.(32) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer while a member.(33) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.(34) "Retirement allowance" means the sum of the annuity and the pension.(35) "Retirement system" means the public employees' retirement system provided for in this chapter.(36) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated all employment with an employer. Separation from service or employment does not occur, and if claimed by an employer or employee may be a violation of RCW 41.40.055, when an employee and employer have a written or oral agreement to resume employment with the same employer following termination. Mere expressions or inquiries about postretirement employment by an employer or employee that do not constitute a commitment to reemploy the employee after retirement are not an agreement under this subsection.(37)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, except as provided in RCW 41.40.088, means periods of employment in an eligible position or positions for one or more employers rendered to any employer for which compensation is paid, and includes time spent in office as an elected or appointed official of an employer. Compensation earnable earned in full time work for 70 hours or more in any given calendar month shall constitute one service credit month except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for less than 70 hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of service except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Only service credit months and one-quarter service credit months shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter. Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is not service.(i) Service by a state employee officially assigned by the state on a temporary basis to assist another public agency, shall be considered as service as a state employee: PROVIDED, That service to any other public agency shall not be considered service as a state employee if such service has been used to establish benefits in any other public retirement system.(ii) An individual shall receive no more than a total of 12 service credit months of service during any calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for seventy or more hours is rendered.(iii) A school district employee may count up to 45 days of sick leave as creditable service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 1 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than 45 days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:(A) Less than 22 days equals one-quarter service credit month;(B) 22 days equals one service credit month;(C) More than 22 days but less than 45 days equals one and one-quarter service credit month.(iv) Reduction efforts such as furloughs, reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or other similar situations as contemplated by subsection (6)(c)(iii) of this section do not result in a reduction in service credit that otherwise would have been earned for that month of work, and the member shall receive the full service credit for the hours that were scheduled to be worked before the reduction.(b) "Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment by a member in an eligible position or positions for one or more employers for which compensation earnable is paid. Compensation earnable earned for 90 or more hours in any calendar month shall constitute one service credit month except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for at least 70 hours but less than 90 hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for less than 70 hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is not service.Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.(i) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be full time service, except that persons serving in state elective positions who are members of the Washington school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, public safety employees' retirement system, or law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system at the time of election or appointment to such position may elect to continue membership in the Washington school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, public safety employees' retirement system, or law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system.(ii) A member shall receive a total of not more than 12 service credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered.(iii) Up to 45 days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than 45 days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:(A) Less than 11 days equals one-quarter service credit month;(B) 11 or more days but less than 22 days equals one-half service credit month;(C) 22 days equals one service credit month;(D) More than 22 days but less than 33 days equals one and one-quarter service credit month;(E) 33 or more days but less than 45 days equals one and one-half service credit month.(iv) Reduction efforts such as furloughs, reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or other similar situations as contemplated by subsection (6)(c)(iii) of this section do not result in a reduction in service credit that otherwise would have been earned for that month of work, and the member shall receive the full service credit for the hours that were scheduled to be worked before the reduction.(38) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one.(39) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.(40) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).(41) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.(42) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.(43) "Totally incapacitated for duty" means total inability to perform the duties of a member's employment or office or any other work for which the member is qualified by training or experience.Sec. 438. RCW 41.40.037 and 2025 c 284 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.(2)(a) A retiree from plan 1, plan 2, or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without suspension of his or her benefit.(b) Between March 23, 2022, and January 1, 2030, a retiree, including a retiree who has retired under the alternate early retirement provisions of RCW 41.40.630(3)(b) or 41.40.820(3)(b), who reenters employment more than 100 days after his or her accrual date, and who enters service in a school district in a nonadministrative position shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year.(c) Between April 14, 2023, and July 1, 2026, a retiree, including a retiree who has retired under the alternate early retirement provisions of RCW 41.40.630(3)(b) or 41.40.820(3)(b), and who enters service in a nonadministrative position as a licensed nurse for a state agency, shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year.(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW 41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement shall be reinstated.(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the use of this section for the select committee on pension policy.(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year without a reduction of his or her pension.Sec. 439. RCW 41.40.059 and 1992 c 157 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:Any active member of this retirement system who has previously established ten or more years' service credit in the city of Seattle's police relief and pension fund system, who withdrew his or her contributions from Seattle's police relief and pension fund system prior to July 1, 1961, and who has never been a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' pension system created in chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW, may receive credit in this retirement system for such service, subject to the terms and conditions specified in RCW 41.40.061.Sec. 440. RCW 41.40.690 and 2004 c 242 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.40.037, no retiree under the provisions of plan 2 shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.37.010, or 41.35.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, except that a retiree who ends his or her membership in the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is not subject to this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective official of a city or town.(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.Sec. 441. RCW 41.40.850 and 2005 c 327 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.40.037, no retiree under the provisions of plan 3 shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.37.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, except that a retiree who ends his or her membership in the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is not subject to this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective official of a city or town.(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.Sec. 442. RCW 41.45.020 and 2006 c 365 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Council" means the pension funding council created in RCW 41.45.100.(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems.(3) "((Law))Restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system ((plan 1))" and "law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2" means the benefits and funding provisions under chapters 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) and 41.26 RCW, respectively.(4) "Public employees' retirement system plan 1," "public employees' retirement system plan 2," and "public employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.40 RCW.(5) "Teachers' retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement system plan 2," and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.(6) "School employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.35 RCW.(7) "Washington state patrol retirement system" means the retirement benefits provided under chapter 43.43 RCW.(8) "Unfunded liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of a retirement system.(9) "Actuary" or "state actuary" means the state actuary employed under chapter 44.44 RCW.(10) "State retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030.(11) "Classified employee" means a member of the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.(12) "Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as defined in RCW 41.32.010(((15))).(13) "Select committee" means the select committee on pension policy created in RCW 41.04.276.(14) "Actuarial value of assets" means the value of pension plan investments and other property used by the actuary for the purpose of an actuarial valuation.(15) "Public safety employees' retirement system plan 2" means the benefits and funding provisions established under chapter 41.37 RCW.(16) "Normal cost" means the portion of the actuarial present value of projected benefits and expenses that is allocated to a period, typically twelve months, under the actuarial cost method.Sec. 443. RCW 41.45.050 and 2020 c 103 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Employers of members of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the Washington state patrol retirement system, and the higher education retirement plans shall make contributions to those systems and plans based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070.(2) The state shall make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070. The state treasurer shall transfer the required contributions each month on the basis of salary data provided by the department.(3) The department shall bill employers, and the state shall make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, using the combined rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 regardless of the level of appropriation provided in the biennial budget. Any member of an affected retirement system may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding, require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.(4) The contributions received for the public employees' retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining public employees' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.(5) The contributions received for the teachers' retirement system shall be allocated between the plan 1 fund and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining teachers' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the plan 1 fund.(6) The contributions received for the school employees' retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining school employees' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.(7) The contributions received for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 shall be deposited in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 fund.(8) The contributions received for the public safety employees' retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the plan 2 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the plan 2 fund. All remaining public safety employees' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.(9) The contributions received for the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund shall be deposited in the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund and amounts received from each institution accounted for separately and shall only be used to make benefit payments to the beneficiaries of that institution's plan.(10) The funding of the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' defined benefit retirement system shall be provided pursuant to sections 104 and 105 of this act. Contributions, if received for the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' defined benefit retirement system, shall be based upon the amounts established in RCW 41.45.060 and shall be deposited in the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement fund.Sec. 444. RCW 41.48.030 and 2008 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The governor is hereby authorized to enter on behalf of the state into an agreement with the federal secretary of health and human services consistent with the terms and provisions of this chapter, for the purpose of extending the benefits of the federal old-age and survivors insurance system to employees of the state or any political subdivision not members of an existing retirement system, or to members of a retirement system established by the state or by a political subdivision thereof or by an institution of higher learning with respect to services specified in such agreement which constitute "employment" as defined in RCW 41.48.020. Such agreement may contain such provisions relating to coverage, benefits, contributions, effective date, modification and termination of the agreement, administration, and other appropriate provisions as the governor and secretary of health and human services shall agree upon, but, except as may be otherwise required by or under the social security act as to the services to be covered, such agreement shall provide in effect that:(a) Benefits will be provided for employees whose services are covered by the agreement (and their dependents and survivors) on the same basis as though such services constituted employment within the meaning of Title II of the social security act;(b) The state will pay to the secretary of the treasury, at such time or times as may be prescribed under the social security act, contributions with respect to wages (as defined in RCW 41.48.020), equal to the sum of the taxes which would be imposed by the federal insurance contributions act if the services covered by the agreement constituted employment within the meaning of that act;(c) Such agreement shall be effective with respect to services in employment covered by the agreement or modification thereof performed after a date specified therein but in no event may it be effective with respect to any such services performed prior to the first day of the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year in which such agreement or modification of the agreement is accepted by the secretary of health and human services;(d) All services which constitute employment as defined in RCW 41.48.020 and are performed in the employ of the state by employees of the state, shall be covered by the agreement;(e) All services which (i) constitute employment as defined in RCW 41.48.020, (ii) are performed in the employ of a political subdivision of the state, and (iii) are covered by a plan which is in conformity with the terms of the agreement and has been approved by the governor under RCW 41.48.050, shall be covered by the agreement; (f) As modified, the agreement shall include all services described in either (d) or (e) of this subsection and performed by individuals to whom section 218(c)(3)(C) of the social security act is applicable, and shall provide that the service of any such individual shall continue to be covered by the agreement in case he or she thereafter becomes eligible to be a member of a retirement system; (g) As modified, the agreement shall include all services described in either (d) or (e) of this subsection and performed by individuals in positions covered by a retirement system with respect to which the governor has issued a certificate to the secretary of health and human services pursuant to subsection (5) of this section; and(h) Law enforcement officers and firefighters of each political subdivision of this state who are covered by the ((Washington))restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system or law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system ((act))plan 2, chapter 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) or 41.26 RCW, shall constitute a separate "coverage group" for purposes of the agreement entered into under this section and for purposes of section 218 of the social security act.(2) Any instrumentality jointly created by this state and any other state or states is hereby authorized, upon the granting of like authority by such other state or states, (a) to enter into an agreement with the secretary of health and human services whereby the benefits of the federal old-age and survivors insurance system shall be extended to employees of such instrumentality, (b) to require its employees to pay (and for that purpose to deduct from their wages) contributions equal to the amounts which they would be required to pay under RCW 41.48.040(1) if they were covered by an agreement made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and (c) to make payments to the secretary of the treasury in accordance with such agreement, including payments from its own funds, and otherwise to comply with such agreements. Such agreement shall, to the extent practicable, be consistent with the terms and provisions of subsection (1) of this section and other provisions of this chapter.(3) The governor is empowered to authorize a referendum, and to designate an agency or individual to supervise its conduct, in accordance with the requirements of section 218(d)(3) of the social security act, and subsection (4) of this section on the question of whether service in all positions covered by a retirement system established by the state or by a political subdivision thereof should be excluded from or included under an agreement under this chapter. If a retirement system covers positions of employees of the state of Washington, of the institutions of higher learning, and positions of employees of one or more of the political subdivisions of the state, then for the purpose of the referendum as provided in this section, there may be deemed to be a separate retirement system with respect to employees of the state, or any one or more of the political subdivisions, or institutions of higher learning and the governor shall authorize a referendum upon request of the subdivisions' or institutions' of higher learning governing body: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That if a referendum of state employees generally fails to produce a favorable majority vote then the governor may authorize a referendum covering positions of employees in any state department who are compensated in whole or in part from grants made to this state under Title III of the federal social security act: PROVIDED, That any city or town affiliated with the statewide city employees retirement system organized under chapter 41.44 RCW may at its option agree to a plan submitted by the board of trustees of that statewide city employees retirement system for inclusion under an agreement under this chapter if the referendum to be held as provided in this section indicates a favorable result: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the teachers' retirement system be considered one system for the purpose of the referendum except as applied to the several state colleges ((of education)). The notice of referendum required by section 218(d)(3)(C) of the social security act to be given to employees shall contain or shall be accompanied by a statement, in such form and such detail as the agency or individual designated to supervise the referendum shall deem necessary and sufficient, to inform the employees of the rights which will accrue to them and their dependents and survivors, and the liabilities to which they will be subject, if their services are included under an agreement under this chapter.(4) The governor, before authorizing a referendum, shall require the following conditions to be met:(a) The referendum shall be by secret written ballot on the question of whether service in positions covered by such retirement system shall be excluded from or included under the agreement between the governor and the secretary of health and human services provided for in subsection (1) of this section;(b) An opportunity to vote in such referendum shall be given and shall be limited to eligible employees;(c) Not less than ninety days' notice of such referendum shall be given to all such employees;(d) Such referendum shall be conducted under the supervision of the governor or of an agency or individual designated by the governor;(e)(i) The proposal for coverage shall be approved only if a majority of the eligible employees vote in favor of including services in such positions under the agreement;(ii) Coverage obtained through a divided referendum process shall extend coverage to law enforcement officers, firefighters, and employees of political subdivisions of this state, who have membership in a qualified retirement system, allowing them to obtain medicare coverage only (HI-only). In such a divided referendum process, those members voting in favor of medicare coverage constitute a separate coverage group;(f) The state legislature, in the case of a referendum affecting the rights and liabilities of state employees covered under the state employees' retirement system and employees under the teachers' retirement system, and in all other cases the local legislative authority or governing body, shall have specifically approved the proposed plan and approved any necessary structural adjustment to the existing system to conform with the proposed plan;(g) In the case of a referendum authorized under section 218(d)(6) of the social security act and (e)(ii) of this subsection, the retirement system will be divided into two parts or divisions. One part or division of the retirement system shall be composed of positions of those members of the system who desire coverage under the agreement as permitted by this section. The remaining part or division of the retirement system shall be composed of positions of those members who do not desire coverage under such an agreement. Each part or division is a separate retirement system for the purposes of section 218(d) of the social security act. The positions of individuals who become members of the system after the coverage is extended shall be included in the part or division of the system composed of members desiring the coverage, with the exception of positions that are excluded in the agreement.(5) Upon receiving satisfactory evidence that with respect to any such referendum the conditions specified in subsection (4) of this section and section 218(d)(3) of the social security act have been met, the governor shall so certify to the secretary of health and human services.(6) If the legislative body of any political subdivision of this state certifies to the governor that a referendum has been held under the terms of RCW 41.48.050(1)(i) and gives notice to the governor of termination of social security for any coverage group of the political subdivision, the governor shall give two years advance notice in writing to the federal department of health and human services of the termination of the agreement entered into under this section with respect to that coverage group.Sec. 445. RCW 41.48.050 and 2012 c 117 s 79 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each political subdivision of the state is hereby authorized to submit for approval by the governor a plan for extending the benefits of title II of the social security act, in conformity with the applicable provisions of such act, to those employees of such political subdivisions who are not covered by an existing pension or retirement system. Each pension or retirement system established by the state or a political subdivision thereof is hereby authorized to submit for approval by the governor a plan for extending the benefits of title II of the social security act, in conformity with applicable provisions of such act, to members of such pension or retirement system. Each such plan and any amendment thereof shall be approved by the governor if he or she finds that such plan, or such plan as amended, is in conformity with such requirements as are provided in regulations of the governor, except that no such plan shall be approved unless((â)):(a) It is in conformity with the requirements of the social security act and with the agreement entered into under RCW 41.48.030;(b) It provides that all services which constitute employment as defined in RCW 41.48.020 and are performed in the employ of the political subdivision by employees thereof, shall be covered by the plan;(c) It specifies the source or sources from which the funds necessary to make the payments required by ((paragraph (a) of)) subsections (3)(a) and ((by subsection)) (4) of this section are expected to be derived and contains reasonable assurance that such sources will be adequate for such purposes;(d) It provides that in the plan of coverage for members of the state teachers' retirement system or for state employee members of the state employees' retirement system, there shall be no additional cost to or involvement of the state until such plan has received prior approval by the legislature;(e) It provides for such methods of administration of the plan by the political subdivision as are found by the governor to be necessary for the proper and efficient administration of the plan;(f) It provides that the political subdivision will make such reports, in such form and containing such information, as the governor may from time to time require and comply with such provisions as the governor or the secretary of health, education, and welfare may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports; ((and))(g) It authorizes the governor to terminate the plan in its entirety, in his or her discretion, if he or she finds that there has been a failure to comply substantially with any provision contained in such plan, such termination to take effect at the expiration of such notice and on such conditions as may be provided by regulations of the governor and may be consistent with the provisions of the social security act;(h) It provides that law enforcement officers and firefighters of each political subdivision of this state who are covered by the ((Washington Law Enforcement Officers' and Firefighters' Retirement System Act (chapter 209, Laws of 1969 ex. sess.)))law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement systems under chapters 41.26 and 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW as now in existence or hereafter amended shall constitute a separate "coverage group" for purposes of the plan or agreement entered into under this section and for purposes of section 216 of the social security act. To the extent that the plan or agreement entered into between the state and any political subdivision of this state is inconsistent with this subsection, the governor shall seek to modify the inconsistency;(i) It provides that the plan or agreement may be terminated by any political subdivision as to any such coverage group upon giving at least two years advance notice in writing to the governor, effective at the end of the calendar quarter specified in the notice. It shall specify that before notice of such termination is given, a referendum shall be held among the members of the coverage group under the following conditions:(i) The referendum shall be conducted under the supervision of the legislative body of the political subdivision.(ii) Not less than sixty days' notice of such referendum shall be given to members of the coverage group.(iii) An opportunity to vote by secret ballot in such referendum shall be given and shall be limited to all members of the coverage group.(iv) The proposal for termination shall be approved only if a majority of the coverage group vote in favor of termination.(v) If a majority of the coverage group vote in favor of termination, the legislative body of the political subdivision shall certify the results of the referendum to the governor and give notice of termination of such coverage group.(2) The governor shall not finally refuse to approve a plan submitted by a political subdivision under subsection (1) (([of this section]))of this section, and shall not terminate an approved plan, without reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing to the political subdivision affected thereby.(3)(a) Each political subdivision as to which a plan has been approved under this section shall pay into the contribution account, with respect to wages (as defined in RCW 41.48.020), at such time or times as the governor may by regulation prescribe, contributions in the amounts and at the rates specified in the applicable agreement entered into by the governor under RCW 41.48.030.(b) Each political subdivision required to make payments under ((paragraph)) (a) of this subsection is authorized, in consideration of the employee's retention in, or entry upon, employment after enactment of this chapter, to impose upon each of its employees, as to services which are covered by an approved plan, a contribution with respect to his or her wages (as defined in RCW 41.48.020), not exceeding the amount of employee tax which is imposed by the federal insurance contributions act, and to deduct the amount of such contribution from his or her wages as and when paid. Contributions so collected shall be paid into the OASI contribution account in partial discharge of the liability of such political subdivision or instrumentality under ((paragraph)) (a) of this subsection. Failure to deduct such contribution shall not relieve the employee or employer of liability therefor.(4) Delinquent reports and payments due under ((paragraph (f) of)) subsections (1)(f) and ((paragraph (a) of subsection)) (3)(a) of this section will be subject to an added interest charge of six percent per year or, if higher, the rate chargeable to the state by the secretary by virtue of federal law, if the late report or payment contributes to any federal penalty for late filing of reports or for late deposit of contributions. Delinquent contributions, interest, and penalties may be recovered by civil action or may, at the request of the governor, be deducted from any other moneys payable to the political subdivision by any department or agency of the state.Sec. 446. RCW 41.50.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As soon as possible but not more than one hundred and eighty days after March 19, 1976, there is transferred to the department of retirement systems, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all powers, duties, and functions of:(a) The Washington public employees' retirement system;(b) The Washington state teachers' retirement system;(c) The Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system;(d) The Washington state patrol retirement system;(e) The Washington judicial retirement system; and(f) The state treasurer with respect to the administration of the judges' retirement fund imposed pursuant to chapter 2.12 RCW.(2) On July 1, 1996, there is transferred to the department all powers, duties, and functions of the deferred compensation committee.(3) The department shall administer chapter 41.34 RCW.(4) The department shall administer the Washington school employees' retirement system created under chapter 41.35 RCW.(5) The department shall administer the Washington public safety employees' retirement system created under chapter 41.37 RCW.(6) The department shall administer the collection of employer contributions and initial prefunding of the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefits, also referred to as the annuity or retirement income plans created under chapter 28B.10 RCW.(7) The department shall administer the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW.Sec. 447. RCW 41.50.033 and 2019 c 64 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The director shall determine when interest, if provided by a plan, shall be credited to accounts in the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, or the Washington state patrol retirement system. The amounts to be credited and the methods of doing so shall be at the director's discretion, except that if interest is credited, it shall be done at least quarterly.(2) Interest as determined by the director under this section is "regular interest" as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, 41.26.030, section 303 of this act, and 43.43.120.(3) The legislature affirms that the authority of the director under RCW 41.40.020 and 41.50.030 includes the authority and responsibility to establish the amount and all conditions for regular interest, if any. The legislature intends chapter 493, Laws of 2007 to be curative, remedial, and retrospectively applicable.Sec. 448. RCW 41.50.055 and 1991 c 35 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:The administration of the ((Washington))restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system and law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system ((is)), chapters 41.26 and 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW, are hereby vested in the director of retirement systems, and the director shall:(1) Keep in convenient form such data as shall be deemed necessary for actuarial evaluation purposes;(2) As of March 1, 1970, and at least every two years thereafter, through the state actuary, make an actuarial valuation as to the mortality and service experience of the beneficiaries under this chapter and the various accounts created for the purpose of showing the financial status of the retirement fund;(3) Adopt for the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system the mortality tables and such other tables as shall be deemed necessary;(4) Keep a record of all its proceedings, which shall be open to inspection by the public;(5) From time to time adopt such rules and regulations not inconsistent with chapters 41.26 and 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW, for the administration of the provisions of this chapter, for the administration of the fund created by this chapter and the several accounts thereof, and for the transaction of the business of the system;(6) Prepare and publish annually a financial statement showing the condition of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' fund and the various accounts thereof, and setting forth such other facts, recommendations and data as may be of use in the advancement of knowledge concerning the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and furnish a copy thereof to each employer, and to such members as may request copies thereof;(7) Perform such other functions as are required for the execution of the provisions of chapters 41.26 and 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW;(8) Fix the amount of interest to be credited at a rate which shall be based upon the net annual earnings of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' fund for the preceding twelve-month period and from time to time make any necessary changes in such rate;(9) Pay from the department of retirement systems expense fund the expenses incurred in administration of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system from those funds appropriated for that purpose;(10) Perform any other duties prescribed elsewhere in chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW;(11) Issue decisions relating to appeals initiated pursuant to RCW 41.16.145 and 41.18.104 as now or hereafter amended and shall be authorized to order increased benefits pursuant to RCW 41.16.145 and 41.18.104 as now or hereafter amended.Sec. 449. RCW 41.50.075 and 2020 c 103 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Two funds are))A fund is hereby created and established in the state treasury to be known as ((the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement fund, and)) the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement fund which shall consist of all moneys paid into ((them))the fund in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW, whether such moneys take the form of cash, securities, or other assets. The ((plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, and the)) plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.(2) All of the assets of the Washington state teachers' retirement system shall be credited according to the purposes for which they are held, to two funds to be maintained in the state treasury, namely, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund and the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 2 and 3.(3) There is hereby established in the state treasury two separate funds, namely the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3.(4) There is hereby established in the state treasury the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the school employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3.(5) There is hereby established in the state treasury the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2 fund. The plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2.(6)(a)(i) There is hereby established in the state treasury the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund. The higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of each of the higher education retirement plans.(ii) The fund in this subsection (6) was originally created under chapter 47, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981).(b) The office of financial management must create individual accounts for each institution of higher education within the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund. For fiscal year 2021, the office of financial management must transfer all the assets of the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund into the individual accounts for each institution that will be used to manage the accounting for each benefit plan. The higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund will include all the amounts in the individual accounts created in this subsection.(7) The department shall administer the funds established under the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), including:(a) The restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' defined benefit retirement fund; and(b) The pension surplus holding account.Sec. 450. RCW 41.50.080 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:The state investment board shall provide for the investment of all funds of the Washington public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement systems under chapters 41.26 and 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW, the Washington state patrol retirement system, the Washington judicial retirement system, the Washington public safety employees' retirement system, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, and the judges' retirement fund, pursuant to RCW 43.84.150, and may sell or exchange investments acquired in the exercise of that authority.Sec. 451. RCW 41.50.090 and 1985 c 102 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, on the effective date of transfer as provided in RCW 41.50.030, the department shall succeed to and is vested with all powers, duties, and functions now or by any concurrent act of this 1976 legislature vested in the individual retirement boards set forth in RCW 41.50.030 relating to the administration of their various retirement systems, including but not limited to the power to appoint a staff and define the duties thereof: PROVIDED, That actuarial services required by the department shall be performed by the state actuary as provided in RCW 44.44.040.(2) The department shall keep each retirement board fully informed on the administration of the corresponding retirement system, and shall furnish any information requested by a retirement board.(3) Rules proposed by the director under RCW 2.10.070, 41.50.055, 41.32.025, or 41.40.020 shall be submitted to the appropriate retirement boards for review prior to adoption. After receiving approval of the members of the appropriate board, such rules shall become effective as provided by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.(4) Each retirement board shall continue to perform all functions as are vested in it by law with respect to applications for benefits paid upon either temporary or permanent disability, with such staff assistance from the department as may be required. The director shall perform those functions with respect to disability benefits as are vested in him or her by ((RCW 41.26.120, 41.26.125, and 41.26.200))chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act).Sec. 452. RCW 41.50.110 and 2025 c 424 s 941 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in chapters 2.10, 2.12, 28B.10, 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 43.43, and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems expense fund.(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and report to each employer, as defined in RCW 28B.10.400, 41.26.030, section 303 of this act, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional share of the entire expense of the administration of the retirement system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium or fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's members bears to the total salaries of all members in the entire system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined in RCW 28B.10.400, 41.26.030, section 303 of this act, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of each month for the amount due for that month to the department of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be made on a percentage rate of salary established by the department. However, the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs or savings in administering the department.(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the retirement system expense fund.(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(4) shall be paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.(7) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the department of retirement systems' expense fund to the state general fund.Sec. 453. RCW 41.50.112 and 2000 c 247 s 1107 are each amended to read as follows:Employers, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, section 303 of this act, 41.32.010, 41.34.020, 41.35.010, and 41.40.010, must report all member data to the department in a format designed and communicated by the department. Employers failing to comply with this reporting requirement shall be assessed an additional fee as defined under RCW 41.50.110(5).Sec. 454. RCW 41.50.150 and 2004 c 242 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The employer of any employee whose retirement benefits are based in part on excess compensation, as defined in this section, shall, upon receipt of a billing from the department, pay into the appropriate retirement system the present value at the time of the employee's retirement of the total estimated cost of all present and future benefits from the retirement system attributable to the excess compensation. The state actuary shall determine the estimated cost using the same method and procedure as is used in preparing fiscal note costs for the legislature. However, the director may in the director's discretion decline to bill the employer if the amount due is less than fifty dollars. Accounts unsettled within thirty days of the receipt of the billing shall be assessed an interest penalty of one percent of the amount due for each month or fraction thereof beyond the original thirty-day period.(2) "Excess compensation," as used in this section, includes the following payments, if used in the calculation of the employee's retirement allowance:(a) A cash out of unused annual leave in excess of two hundred forty hours of such leave. "Cash out" for purposes of this subsection means:(i) Any payment in lieu of an accrual of annual leave; or(ii) Any payment added to salary or wages, concurrent with a reduction of annual leave;(b) A cash out of any other form of leave;(c) A payment for, or in lieu of, any personal expense or transportation allowance to the extent that payment qualifies as reportable compensation in the member's retirement system;(d) The portion of any payment, including overtime payments, that exceeds twice the regular daily or hourly rate of pay; and(e) Any termination or severance payment.(3) This section applies to the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030 and to retirements occurring on or after March 15, 1984. Nothing in this section is intended to amend or determine the meaning of any definition in chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.32, 41.40, 41.35, 41.37, or 43.43 RCW or to determine in any manner what payments are includable in the calculation of a retirement allowance under such chapters.(4) An employer is not relieved of liability under this section because of the death of any person either before or after the billing from the department.Sec. 455. RCW 41.50.255 and 2025 c 424 s 943 are each amended to read as follows:The director is authorized to pay from the interest earnings of the trust funds of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the Washington state patrol retirement system, the Washington judicial retirement system, the judges' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, or the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement systems under chapters 41.26 and 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW lawful obligations of the appropriate system for legal, medical, and, during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, administrative expenses, which expenses are primarily incurred for the purpose of protecting or preventing losses from the appropriate trust fund or are incurred in compliance with statutes governing such funds.The term "legal expense" includes, but is not limited to, legal services provided through the legal services revolving fund, fees for expert witnesses, travel expenses, fees for court reporters, cost of transcript preparation, and reproduction of documents.The term "medical expense" includes, but is not limited to, expenses for the medical examination or reexamination of members or retirees, the costs of preparation of medical reports, and fees charged by medical professionals for attendance at discovery proceedings or hearings.The term "administrative expenses" includes, but is not limited to, expenses incurred to prevent losses to the trust funds such as audits, cybersecurity, petition decisions, departmental liaison work with the attorney general's office, and other similar expenses incurred by the department to ensure that trust funds are protected against risks that might lead to losses from the trust funds.The director may also pay from the interest earnings of the trust funds specified in this section costs incurred in investigating fraud and collecting overpayments, including expenses incurred to review and investigate cases of possible fraud against the trust funds and collection agency fees and other costs incurred in recovering overpayments. Recovered funds must be returned to the appropriate trust funds.Sec. 456. RCW 41.50.500 and 2004 c 242 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 41.50.500 through 41.50.650, 41.50.670 through 41.50.720, and 26.09.138.(1) "Benefits" means periodic retirement payments or a withdrawal of accumulated contributions.(2) "Disposable benefits" means that part of the benefits of an individual remaining after the deduction from those benefits of any amount required by law to be withheld. The term "required by law to be withheld" does not include any deduction elective to the member.(3) "Dissolution order" means any judgment, decree, or order of spousal maintenance, property division, or court-approved property settlement incident to a decree of divorce, dissolution, invalidity, or legal separation issued by the superior court of the state of Washington or a judgment, decree, or other order of spousal support issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state or country, that has been registered or otherwise made enforceable in this state.(4) "Mandatory benefits assignment order" means an order issued to the department of retirement systems pursuant to RCW 41.50.570 to withhold and deliver benefits payable to an obligor under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.32, 41.40, 41.35, 41.37, or 43.43 RCW.(5) "Obligee" means an ex spouse or spouse to whom a duty of spousal maintenance or property division obligation is owed.(6) "Obligor" means the spouse or ex spouse owing a duty of spousal maintenance or a property division obligation.(7) "Periodic retirement payments" means periodic payments of retirement allowances, including but not limited to service retirement allowances, disability retirement allowances, and survivors' allowances. The term does not include a withdrawal of accumulated contributions.(8) "Property division obligation" means any outstanding court-ordered property division or court-approved property settlement obligation incident to a decree of divorce, dissolution, or legal separation.(9) "Standard allowance" means a benefit payment option selected under RCW 2.10.146(1)(a), 41.26.460(1)(a), 41.32.785(1)(a), 41.40.188(1)(a), 41.40.660(1), 41.40.845(1)(a), 41.37.170, or 41.35.220 that ceases upon the death of the retiree. Standard allowance also means the benefit allowance provided under RCW 2.10.110, 2.10.130, 43.43.260, ((41.26.100, 41.26.130(1)(a),))section 318 or 324(1)(a) of this act or chapter 2.12 RCW. Standard allowance also means the maximum retirement allowance available under RCW 41.32.530(1) following member withdrawal of accumulated contributions, if any.(10) "Withdrawal of accumulated contributions" means a lump sum payment to a retirement system member of all or a part of the member's accumulated contributions, including accrued interest, at the request of the member including any lump sum amount paid upon the death of the member.Sec. 457. RCW 41.50.650 and 1991 c 365 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Notwithstanding RCW 2.10.180(1), 2.12.090(1), ((41.26.180))41.26.053(1), section 310(1) of this act, 41.32.052(1), 41.40.052(1), and 43.43.310(1) as those sections existed between July 1, 1987, and July 28, 1991, the department of retirement systems shall make direct payments of benefits to a spouse or ex spouse pursuant to court orders or decrees entered before July 1, 1987, that complied with all the requirements in RCW 2.10.180(1), 2.12.090(2), ((41.26.180))41.26.053(3), section 310(3) of this act, 41.32.052(3), 41.40.052(3), 43.43.310(2), and 41.04.310 through 41.04.330, as such requirements existed before July 1, 1987. The department shall be responsible for making direct payments only if the decree or court order expressly orders the department to make direct payments to the spouse or ex spouse and specifies a sum certain or percentage amount of the benefit payments to be made to the spouse or ex spouse.(2) The department of retirement systems shall notify a spouse or ex spouse who, pursuant to a mandatory benefits assignment order entered between July 1, 1987, and July 28, 1991, is receiving benefits in satisfaction of a court-ordered property division, that he or she is entitled to receive direct payments of a court-ordered property division pursuant to RCW 41.50.670 if the dissolution order fully complies or is modified to fully comply with the requirements of RCW 41.50.670 through 41.50.720 and, as applicable, RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, ((41.26.180))41.26.053, section 310 of this act, 41.32.052, 41.40.052, 43.43.310, and 26.09.138. The department shall send notice in writing as soon as reasonably feasible but no later than ninety days after July 28, 1991. The department shall also send notice to the obligor member spouse.Sec. 458. RCW 41.50.670 and 2004 c 242 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Nothing in this chapter regarding mandatory assignment of benefits to enforce a spousal maintenance obligation shall abridge the right of an obligee to direct payments of retirement benefits to satisfy a property division obligation ordered pursuant to a court decree of dissolution or legal separation or any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation as provided in RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, 41.26.053, ((41.26.162,))section 310 or 330 of this act, 41.32.052, 41.35.100, 41.34.070(4), 41.40.052, 43.43.310, 41.37.090, or 26.09.138, as those statutes existed before July 1, 1987, and as those statutes exist on and after July 28, 1991. The department shall pay benefits under this chapter in a lump sum or as a portion of periodic retirement payments as expressly provided by the dissolution order. A dissolution order may not order the department to pay a periodic retirement payment or lump sum unless that payment is specifically authorized under the provisions of chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.32, 41.35, 41.34, 41.40, 41.37, or 43.43 RCW, as applicable.(2) The department shall pay directly to an obligee the amount of periodic retirement payments or lump sum payment, as appropriate, specified in the dissolution order if the dissolution order filed with the department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section includes a provision that states in the following form:If .Â .Â .Â .Â .Â . (the obligor) receives periodic retirement payments as defined in RCW 41.50.500, the department of retirement systems shall pay to .Â .Â .Â .Â .Â . (the obligee) .Â .Â .Â .Â .Â . dollars from such payments or .Â .Â . percent of such payments. If the obligor's debt is expressed as a percentage of his or her periodic retirement payment and the obligee does not have a survivorship interest in the obligor's benefit, the amount received by the obligee shall be the percentage of the periodic retirement payment that the obligor would have received had he or she selected a standard allowance.If .Â .Â .Â .Â .Â . (the obligor) requests or has requested a withdrawal of accumulated contributions as defined in RCW 41.50.500, or becomes eligible for a lump sum death benefit, the department of retirement systems shall pay to .Â .Â .Â .Â .Â . (the obligee) .Â .Â .Â .Â .Â . dollars plus interest at the rate paid by the department of retirement systems on member contributions. Such interest to accrue from the date of this order's entry with the court of record.(3) This section does not require a member to select a standard allowance upon retirement nor does it require the department to recalculate the amount of a retiree's periodic retirement payment based on a change in survivor option.(4) A court order under this section may not order the department to pay more than seventy-five percent of an obligor's periodic retirement payment to an obligee.(5) Persons whose court decrees were entered between July 1, 1987, and July 28, 1991, shall also be entitled to receive direct payments of retirement benefits to satisfy court-ordered property divisions if the dissolution orders comply or are modified to comply with this section and RCW 41.50.680 through 41.50.720 and, as applicable, RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, 41.26.053, section 310 of this act, 41.32.052, 41.35.100, 41.34.070, 41.40.052, 43.43.310, 41.37.090, and 26.09.138.(6) The obligee must file a copy of the dissolution order with the department within ninety days of that order's entry with the court of record.(7) A division of benefits pursuant to a dissolution order under this section shall be based upon the obligor's gross benefit prior to any deductions. If the department is required to withhold a portion of the member's benefit pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402 and the sum of that amount plus the amount owed to the obligee exceeds the total benefit, the department shall satisfy the withholding requirements under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402 and then pay the remainder to the obligee. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to amounts withheld pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402(i).Sec. 459. RCW 41.50.700 and 2003 c 294 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except under subsection (3) of this section and RCW 41.26.460(5), 41.32.530(5), 41.32.785(5), 41.32.851(4), 41.35.220(4), 41.40.188(5), 41.40.660(5), 41.40.845(4), 43.43.271(4), and 41.34.080, the department's obligation to provide direct payment of a property division obligation to an obligee under RCW 41.50.670 shall cease upon the death of the obligee or upon the death of the obligor, whichever comes first. However, if an obligor dies and is eligible for a lump sum death benefit, the department shall be obligated to provide direct payment to the obligee of all or a portion of the withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order that complies with RCW 41.50.670.(2) The direct payment of a property division obligation to an obligee under RCW 41.50.670 shall be paid as a deduction from the member's periodic retirement payment. An obligee may not direct the department to withhold any funds from such payment.(3) The department's obligation to provide direct payment to a nonmember ex spouse from a preretirement divorce meeting the criteria of RCW 41.26.162(2) or 43.43.270(2) may continue for the life of the member's surviving spouse qualifying for benefits under RCW ((41.26.160, 41.26.161, or)) 43.43.270(2) or section 328 or 329 of this act. Upon the death of the member's surviving spouse qualifying for benefits under RCW ((41.26.160, 41.26.161, or)) 43.43.270(2) or section 328 or 329 of this act, the department's obligation under this subsection shall cease. The department's obligation to provide direct payment to a nonmember ex spouse qualifying for a continued split benefit payment under RCW 41.26.162(3) shall continue for the life of that nonmember ex spouse.Sec. 460. RCW 41.56.030 and 2025 c 322 s 1 and 2025 c 113 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:As used in this chapter:(1) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in RCW 70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded long-term care programs.(2) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in their employment relations with employers.(3) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor program.(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to grievance procedures, subject to RCW 41.58.070, and collective negotiations on personnel matters, including wages, hours, and working conditions, which may be peculiar to an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this chapter.(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the commission.(7) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours; (b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) under chapter 43.216 RCW, is either licensed by the state or is exempt from licensing.(8) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a fish and wildlife officer as defined in RCW 77.08.010 who ranks below deputy chief and includes officers, detectives, sergeants, lieutenants, and captains of the department of fish and wildlife.(9) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined in RCW 74.39A.240(3) who, solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.(10) "Institution of higher education" means the University of Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.(11)(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor who provides spoken language interpreter services, whether paid by a broker, language access agency, or the respective department:(i) For department of social and health services appointments, department of children, youth, and families appointments, medicaid enrollee appointments, or who provided these services on or after January 1, 2011, and before June 10, 2012;(ii) For department of labor and industries authorized medical and vocational providers who provided these services on or after January 1, 2019; or(iii) For state agencies who provided these services on or after January 1, 2019.(b) "Language access provider" does not mean a manager or employee of a broker or a language access agency.(12) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to (i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or (ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from a bargaining unit.(13) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission, council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district court or superior court. For the purposes of this chapter, public employer does not include a comprehensive cancer center participating in a collaborative arrangement as defined in RCW 28B.10.930 that is operated in conformance with RCW 28B.10.930.(14) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act employed by the governing body of any city or town, law enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county, and law enforcement officers employed by the governing body of a municipal airport operating under the provisions of chapter 14.08 RCW; (b) correctional employees who are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(9), by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, in a correctional facility created under RCW 70.48.095, or in a detention facility created under chapter 13.40 RCW that is located in a county with a population over one million five hundred thousand, and who are trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as that term is defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency medical services, or both; (h) employees in the several classes of advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are employed by a public employer; (i) court marshals of any county who are employed by, trained for, and commissioned by the county sheriff and charged with the responsibility of enforcing laws, protecting and maintaining security in all county-owned or contracted property, and performing any other duties assigned to them by the county sheriff or mandated by judicial order; or (j) public safety telecommunicators, as defined in RCW 38.60.020, employed by a public employer. This subsection (14)(j) does not apply to public safety telecommunicators employed by the Washington state patrol or any other state agency.Sec. 461. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2025 c 399 s 13 and 2025 c 190 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account, the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the county 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the Fern Lodge maintenance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation account, the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the pollution liability insurance program trust account, the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' defined benefit retirement fund, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, the long-term services and supports trust account, the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, the Washington saves administrative trust account, and the library operations account.(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 462. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2025 c 399 s 14 and 2025 c 190 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account, the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the county 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the Fern Lodge maintenance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation account, the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' defined benefit retirement fund, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, the long-term services and supports trust account, the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, the Washington saves administrative trust account, and the library operations account.(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 463. RCW 46.52.130 and 2023 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Upon a proper request, the department may only furnish information contained in an abstract of a person's driving record as permitted under this section.(1) Contents of abstract of driving record. An abstract of a person's driving record, whenever possible, must include:(a) An enumeration of motor vehicle accidents in which the person was driving, including:(i) The total number of vehicles involved;(ii) Whether the vehicles were legally parked or moving;(iii) Whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the accident; and(iv) Whether the accident resulted in a fatality;(b) Any reported convictions, forfeitures of bail, or findings that an infraction was committed based upon a violation of any motor vehicle law;(c) The status of the person's driving privilege in this state; and(d) Any reports of failure to appear in response to a traffic citation or failure to respond to a notice of infraction served upon the named individual by an arresting officer.(2) Release of abstract of driving record. Unless otherwise required in this section, the release of an abstract does not require a signed statement by the subject of the abstract. An abstract of a person's driving record may be furnished to the following persons or entities:(a) Named individuals. (i) An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to the individual named in the abstract.(ii) Nothing in this section prevents a court from providing a copy of the driver's abstract to the individual named in the abstract or that named individual's attorney, provided that the named individual has a pending or open infraction or criminal case in that court. A pending case includes criminal cases that have not reached a disposition by plea, stipulation, trial, or amended charge. An open infraction or criminal case includes cases on probation, payment agreement or subject to, or in collections. A probation clerk or probation officer employed by the court may also provide a copy of the driver's abstract to a treatment agency in accordance with (f) of this subsection. Courts may charge a reasonable fee for the production and copying of the abstract for the individual unless the person is indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010.(b) Employers or prospective employers. (i) An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to an employer or prospective employer or agents acting on behalf of an employer or prospective employer of the named individual for purposes related to driving by the individual as a condition of employment or otherwise at the direction of the employer.(ii) The department may provide employers or their agents a three-year insurance carrier driving record of existing employees only for the purposes of sharing the driving record with its insurance carrier for underwriting. Employers may not provide the employees' full driving records to its insurance carrier.(iii) An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to an employer or prospective employer or the agent(s) acting on behalf of an employer or prospective employer of the named individual for purposes unrelated to driving by the individual when a driving record is required by federal or state law, or the employee or prospective employee will be handling heavy equipment or machinery.(iv) Release of an abstract of the driving record of an employee or prospective employee requires a statement signed by: (A) The employee or prospective employee that authorizes the release of the record; and (B) the employer attesting that the information is necessary for employment purposes related to driving by the individual as a condition of employment or otherwise at the direction of the employer. If the employer or prospective employer authorizes agents to obtain this information on their behalf, this must be noted in the statement. The statement must also note that any information contained in the abstract related to an adjudication that is subject to a court order sealing the juvenile record of an employee or prospective employee may not be used by the employer or prospective employer, or an agent authorized to obtain this information on their behalf, unless required by federal regulation or law. The employer or prospective employer must afford the employee or prospective employee an opportunity to demonstrate that an adjudication contained in the abstract is subject to a court order sealing the juvenile record.(v) Upon request of the person named in the abstract provided under this subsection, and upon that same person furnishing copies of court records ruling that the person was not at fault in a motor vehicle accident, the department must indicate on any abstract provided under this subsection that the person was not at fault in the motor vehicle accident.(vi) No employer or prospective employer, nor any agents of an employer or prospective employer, may use information contained in the abstract related to an adjudication that is subject to a court order sealing the juvenile record of an employee or prospective employee for any purpose unless required by federal regulation or law. The employee or prospective employee must furnish a copy of the court order sealing the juvenile record to the employer or prospective employer, or the agents of the employer or prospective employer, as may be required to ensure the application of this subsection.(c) Volunteer organizations. (i) An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to a volunteer organization or an agent for a volunteer organization for which the named individual has submitted an application for a position that would require driving by the individual at the direction of the volunteer organization.(ii) Release of an abstract of the driving record of a prospective volunteer requires a statement signed by: (A) The prospective volunteer that authorizes the release of the record; and (B) the volunteer organization attesting that the information is necessary for purposes related to driving by the individual at the direction of the volunteer organization. If the volunteer organization authorizes an agent to obtain this information on their behalf, this must be noted in the statement.(d) Transit authorities. An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to an employee or agents of a transit authority checking prospective or existing volunteer vanpool drivers for insurance and risk management needs.(e) Insurance carriers. (i) An abstract of the driving record maintained by the department covering the period of not more than the last three years may be furnished to an insurance company or its agents:(A) That has motor vehicle or life insurance in effect covering the named individual;(B) To which the named individual has applied; or(C) That has insurance in effect covering the employer or a prospective employer of the named individual.(ii) The abstract provided to the insurance company must:(A) Not contain any information related to actions committed by law enforcement officers or firefighters, as both terms are defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 303 of this act, or by Washington state patrol officers, while driving official vehicles in the performance of their occupational duty, or by registered tow truck operators as defined in RCW 46.55.010 in the performance of their occupational duties while at the scene of a roadside impound or recovery so long as they are not issued a citation. This does not apply to any situation where the vehicle was used in the commission of a misdemeanor or felony;(B) Include convictions under RCW 46.61.5249 and 46.61.525, except that the abstract must report the convictions only as negligent driving without reference to whether they are for first or second degree negligent driving; and(C) Exclude any deferred prosecution under RCW 10.05.060, except that if a person is removed from a deferred prosecution under RCW 10.05.090, the abstract must show the deferred prosecution as well as the removal.(iii) Any policy of insurance may not be canceled, nonrenewed, denied, or have the rate increased on the basis of information regarding an accident included in the abstract of a driving record, unless the policyholder was determined to be at fault.(iv) Any insurance company or its agents, for underwriting purposes relating to the operation of commercial motor vehicles, may not use any information contained in the abstract relative to any person's operation of motor vehicles while not engaged in such employment. Any insurance company or its agents, for underwriting purposes relating to the operation of noncommercial motor vehicles, may not use any information contained in the abstract relative to any person's operation of commercial motor vehicles. For the purposes of this subsection, "commercial motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.25.010(6).(f) Alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies. An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency approved by the department of health to which the named individual has applied or been assigned for evaluation or treatment, for purposes of assisting employees in making a determination as to what level of treatment, if any, is appropriate, and the abstract must:(i) Also include records of alcohol-related offenses, as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2); and(ii) Indicate whether an alcohol-related offense was originally charged as a violation of either RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504.(g) AttorneysâCity attorneys, county prosecuting attorneys, and named individual's attorney of record. An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the department, including whether a recorded violation is an alcohol-related offense, as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2), that was originally charged as a violation of either RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, may be furnished to city attorneys, county prosecuting attorneys, or the named individual's attorney of record. City attorneys, county prosecuting attorneys, or the named individual's attorney of record may provide the driving record to alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies approved by the department of social and health services to which the named individual has applied or been assigned for evaluation or treatment.(h) State colleges, universities, or agencies, or units of local government. An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to (i) state colleges, universities, or agencies for employment and risk management purposes or (ii) units of local government authorized to self-insure under RCW 48.62.031, or their agents, for employment and risk management purposes. "Unit of local government" includes an insurance pool established under RCW 48.62.031.(i) Superintendent of public instruction. (i) An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to the superintendent of public instruction for review of public school bus driver records. The superintendent or superintendent's designee may discuss information on the driving record with an authorized representative of the employing school district for employment and risk management purposes.(ii) The superintendent of public instruction is exempt from paying the fees related to the reviewing of records and the fee required in subsection (5) of this section.(j) State and federal agencies. An abstract of the driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to state and federal agencies, or their agents, in carrying out its functions.(k) Transportation network companies. An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to a transportation network company or its agents acting on its behalf of the named individual for purposes related to driving by the individual as a condition of being a contracted driver.(l) Research. (i) The department may furnish driving record data to state agencies and bona fide scientific research organizations. The department may require review and approval by an institutional review board. For the purposes of this subsection, "research" means a planned and systematic sociological, psychological, epidemiological, biomedical, or other scientific investigation carried out by a state agency, or by a scientific research professional associated with a bona fide scientific research organization with an objective to contribute to scientific knowledge, the solution of social and health problems, or the evaluation of public benefit and service programs. This definition excludes methods of record analysis and data collection that are subjective, do not permit replication, and are not designed to yield reliable and valid results.(ii) The state agency, or a scientific research professional associated with a bona fide scientific research organization, are exempt from paying the fees related to the reviewing of records and the fee required in subsection (5) of this section. However, the department may charge a cost-recovery fee for the actual cost of providing the data.(3) Reviewing of driving records. (a) In addition to the methods described herein, the director may enter into a contractual agreement for the purpose of reviewing the driving records of existing employees for changes to the record during specified periods of time. The department shall establish a fee for this service, which must be deposited in the highway safety fund. The fee for this service must be set at a level that does not result in a net revenue loss to the state. Any information provided under this subsection must be treated in the same manner and is subject to the same restrictions as driving record abstracts.(b) The department may provide reviewing services to the following entities:(i) Employers for existing employees, or their agents;(ii) Transit authorities for current vanpool drivers, or their agents;(iii) Insurance carriers for current policyholders, or their agents;(iv) State colleges, universities, or agencies, or units of local government, or their agents;(v) The office of the superintendent of public instruction for school bus drivers statewide; and(vi) Transportation network companies, or their agents.(4) Release to third parties prohibited. (a) Any person or entity receiving an abstract of a person's driving record under subsection (2)(b) through (l) of this section shall use the abstract exclusively for his, her, or its own purposes or as otherwise expressly permitted under this section, and shall not divulge any information contained in the abstract to a third party.(b) The following release of records to third parties are hereby authorized:(i) Employers may divulge driving records to regulatory bodies, as defined by the department by rule, such as the United States department of transportation and the federal motor carrier safety administration.(ii) Employers may divulge a three-year driving record to their insurance carrier for underwriting purposes.(iii) Employers may divulge driving records to contracted motor carrier consultants for the purposes of ensuring driver compliance and risk management.(5) Fees. (a) The director shall collect a $15 fee for each abstract of a person's driving record furnished by the department. After depositing $2 of the driver's abstract fee in the move ahead WA flexible account created in RCW 46.68.520, the remainder shall be distributed as follows:(i) Fifty percent must be deposited in the highway safety fund; and(ii) Fifty percent must be deposited according to RCW 46.68.038.(b) Beginning July 1, 2029, the director shall collect an additional $2 fee for each abstract of a person's driving record furnished by the department. The $2 additional driver's abstract fee must be deposited in the move ahead WA flexible account created in RCW 46.68.520.(c) City attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys are exempt from paying the fees specified in (a) and (b) of this subsection for an abstract of a person's driving record furnished by the department for use in criminal proceedings.(6) Violation. (a) Any negligent violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.(b) Any intentional violation of this section is a class C felony.(7) Effective July 1, 2019, the contents of a driving abstract pursuant to this section shall not include any information related to sealed juvenile records unless that information is required by federal law or regulation.Sec. 464. RCW 49.44.160 and 2002 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The legislature intends that public employers be prohibited from misclassifying employees, or taking other action to avoid providing or continuing to provide employment-based benefits to which employees are entitled under state law or employer policies or collective bargaining agreements applicable to the employee's correct classification.Chapter 155, Laws of 2002 does not mandate that any public employer provide benefits to actual temporary, seasonal, or part-time employees beyond the benefits to which they are entitled under state law or employer policies or collective bargaining agreements applicable to the employee's correct classification. Public employers may determine eligibility rules for their own benefit plans and may exclude categories of workers such as "temporary" or "seasonal," so long as the definitions and eligibility rules are objective and applied on a consistent basis. Objective standards, such as control over the work and the length of the employment relationship, should determine whether a person is an employee who is entitled to employee benefits, rather than the arbitrary application of labels, such as "temporary" or "contractor." Common law standards should be used to determine whether a person is performing services as an employee, as a contractor, or as part of an agency relationship.Chapter 155, Laws of 2002 does not modify any statute or policy regarding the employment of: Public employee retirees who are hired for postretirement employment as provided for in chapter 41.26, 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act), 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW or who work as contractors; or enrolled students who receive employment as student employees or as part of their education or financial aid.Sec. 465. RCW 51.08.142 and 2023 c 370 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the department shall adopt a rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW that claims based on mental conditions or mental disabilities caused by stress do not fall within the definition of occupational disease in RCW 51.08.140.(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, the rule adopted under subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to occupational disease claims resulting from posttraumatic stress disorders of firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((17)))(14) (a), (b), (c), and (((h)))(e) or section 303(17) (a), (b), (c), and (h) of this act and firefighters, including supervisors, employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis as a firefighter of a private sector employer's fire department that includes over fifty such firefighters, and law enforcement officers as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((19)))(16) (b), (c), and (((e)))(d) or section 303(19) (b), (c), and (e) of this act, and public safety telecommunicators who receive calls for assistance and dispatch emergency services.(b) For firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((17)))(14) (a), (b), (c), and (((h)))(e) or section 303(17) (a), (b), (c), and (h) of this act and firefighters, including supervisors, employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis as a firefighter of a private sector employer's fire department that includes over fifty such firefighters, and law enforcement officers as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((19)))(16) (b), (c), and (((e)))(d) or section 303(19) (b), (c), and (e) of this act hired after June 7, 2018, and public safety telecommunicators hired after June 11, 2020, (a) of this subsection only applies if the firefighter or law enforcement officer or public safety telecommunicators, as a condition of employment, has submitted to a psychological examination administered by a psychiatrist licensed in the state of Washington under chapter 18.71 RCW or a psychologist licensed in the state of Washington under chapter 18.83 RCW that ruled out the presence of posttraumatic stress disorder from preemployment exposures. If the employer does not provide the psychological examination, (a) of this subsection applies.(c) Posttraumatic stress disorder for purposes of this subsection((s (2))) and subsection (3) of this section is not considered an occupational disease if the disorder is directly attributed to disciplinary action, work evaluation, job transfer, layoff, demotion, termination, or similar action taken in good faith by an employer.(d) "Public safety telecommunicators" means individuals who receive and respond to telephone or other electronic requests for emergency assistance, such as law enforcement, fire, and medical services, and dispatch appropriate emergency responders.(3)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, the rule adopted under subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to occupational disease claims resulting from posttraumatic stress disorders of direct care registered nurses as defined in RCW 51.32.395.(b) The limitation in subsection (2)(c) of this section also applies to this subsection (3).(c) This subsection (3) applies only to a direct care registered nurse who has posttraumatic stress disorder that develops or manifests itself after the individual has been employed on a fully compensated basis as a direct care registered nurse in Washington state for at least 90 consecutive days.Sec. 466. RCW 51.32.050 and 2010 c 261 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Where death results from the injury the expenses of burial not to exceed two hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018 shall be paid.(2)(a) Where death results from the injury, a surviving spouse of a deceased worker eligible for benefits under this title shall receive monthly for life or until remarriage payments according to the following schedule:(i) If there are no children of the deceased worker, sixty percent of the wages of the deceased worker;(ii) If there is one child of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-two percent of the wages of the deceased worker;(iii) If there are two children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-four percent of the wages of the deceased worker;(iv) If there are three children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-six percent of the wages of the deceased worker;(v) If there are four children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, sixty-eight percent of the wages of the deceased worker; or(vi) If there are five or more children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such spouse, seventy percent of the wages of the deceased worker.(b) Where the surviving spouse does not have legal custody of any child or children of the deceased worker or where after the death of the worker legal custody of such child or children passes from such surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such child or children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse shall be made to the person or persons having legal custody of such child or children. The amount of such payments shall be five percent of the monthly benefits payable as a result of the worker's death for each such child but such payments shall not exceed twenty-five percent. Such payments on account of such child or children shall be subtracted from the amount to which such surviving spouse would have been entitled had such surviving spouse had legal custody of all of the children and the surviving spouse shall receive the remainder after such payments on account of such child or children have been subtracted. Such payments on account of a child or children not in the legal custody of such surviving spouse shall be apportioned equally among such children.(c) Payments to the surviving spouse of the deceased worker shall cease at the end of the month in which remarriage occurs: PROVIDED, That a monthly payment shall be made to the child or children of the deceased worker from the month following such remarriage in a sum equal to five percent of the wages of the deceased worker for one child and a sum equal to five percent for each additional child up to a maximum of five such children. Payments to such child or children shall be apportioned equally among such children. Such sum shall be in place of any payments theretofore made for the benefit of or on account of any such child or children. If the surviving spouse does not have legal custody of any child or children of the deceased worker, or if after the death of the worker, legal custody of such child or children passes from such surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such child or children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse shall be made to the person or persons having legal custody of such child or children.(d) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this subsection (2) ((of this section)):(i) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 as follows:Â AFTERPERCENTAGEÂ Â June 30, 1993105%Â Â June 30, 1994110%Â Â June 30, 1995115%Â Â June 30, 1996120%Â (ii) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1, 2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars per month for a surviving spouse and an additional ten dollars per month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children. However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection (2)(d)(ii) is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the deceased worker as determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment due to the surviving spouse shall be equal to the greater of the monthly wages of the deceased worker or the minimum benefit set forth in this section on June 30, 2008.(e) In addition to the monthly payments provided for in ((subsection (2)))(a) through (c) of this ((section))subsection, a surviving spouse or child or children of such worker if there is no surviving spouse, or dependent parent or parents, if there is no surviving spouse or child or children of any such deceased worker shall be forthwith paid a sum equal to one hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, any such children, or parents to share and share alike in said sum.(f) Upon remarriage of a surviving spouse the monthly payments for the child or children shall continue as provided in this section, but the monthly payments to such surviving spouse shall cease at the end of the month during which remarriage occurs. However, after September 8, 1975, an otherwise eligible surviving spouse of a worker who died at any time prior to or after September 8, 1975, shall have an option of:(i)(A) Receiving, once and for all, a lump sum of twenty-four times the monthly compensation rate in effect on the date of remarriage allocable to the spouse for himself or herself pursuant to ((subsection (2)))(a)(i) of this ((section))subsection and subject to any modifications specified under ((subsection (2)))(d) of this ((section))subsection and RCW 51.32.075(3) or fifty percent of the then remaining annuity value of his or her pension, whichever is the lesser: PROVIDED, That if the injury occurred prior to July 28, 1991, the remarriage benefit lump sum available shall be as provided in the remarriage benefit schedules then in effect; (B) If a surviving spouse is the surviving spouse of a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW or the state patrol retirement system under chapter 43.43 RCW, the surviving spouse may receive a lump sum of thirty-six times the monthly compensation rate in effect on the date of remarriage allocable to the spouse for himself or herself pursuant to ((subsection (2)))(a)(i) of this ((section))subsection and RCW 51.32.075(3) or fifty percent of the remaining annuity value of his or her pension provided under this chapter, whichever is the lesser: PROVIDED, That if the injury occurred prior to July 28, 1991, the lump sum benefit shall be as provided in the remarriage benefit schedules then in effect; or(ii) If a surviving spouse does not choose the option specified in ((subsection (2)))(f)(i) of this ((section))subsection to accept the lump sum payment, the remarriage of the surviving spouse of a worker shall not bar him or her from claiming the lump sum payment authorized in ((subsection (2)))(f)(i) of this ((section))subsection during the life of the remarriage, or shall not prevent subsequent monthly payments to him or to her if the remarriage has been terminated by death or has been dissolved or annulled by valid court decree provided he or she has not previously accepted the lump sum payment.(g) If the surviving spouse during the remarriage should die without having previously received the lump sum payment provided in ((subsection (2)))(f)(i) of this ((section))subsection, his or her estate shall be entitled to receive the sum specified under ((subsection (2)))(f)(i) of this ((section))subsection or fifty percent of the then remaining annuity value of his or her pension whichever is the lesser.(h) The effective date of resumption of payments under ((subsection (2)))(f)(ii) of this ((section))subsection to a surviving spouse based upon termination of a remarriage by death, annulment, or dissolution shall be the date of the death or the date the judicial decree of annulment or dissolution becomes final and when application for the payments has been received.(i) If it should be necessary to increase the reserves in the reserve fund or to create a new pension reserve fund as a result of the amendments in chapter 45, Laws of 1975-'76 2nd ex. sess., the amount of such increase in pension reserve in any such case shall be transferred to the reserve fund from the supplemental pension fund.(3) If there is a child or children and no surviving spouse of the deceased worker or the surviving spouse is not eligible for benefits under this title, a sum equal to thirty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker shall be paid monthly for one child and a sum equivalent to fifteen percent of such wage shall be paid monthly for each additional child, the total of such sum to be divided among such children, share and share alike: PROVIDED, That benefits under this subsection or subsection (4) of this section shall not exceed the lesser of sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the time of his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, as follows:Â AFTERPERCENTAGEÂ Â June 30, 1993105%Â Â June 30, 1994110%Â Â June 30, 1995115%Â Â June 30, 1996120%Â (4) In the event a surviving spouse receiving monthly payments dies, the child or children of the deceased worker shall receive the same payment as provided in subsection (3) of this section.(5) If the worker leaves no surviving spouse or child, but leaves a dependent or dependents, a monthly payment shall be made to each dependent equal to fifty percent of the average monthly support actually received by such dependent from the worker during the twelve months next preceding the occurrence of the injury, but the total payment to all dependents in any case shall not exceed the lesser of sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the time of his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018 as follows:Â AFTERPERCENTAGEÂ Â June 30, 1993105%Â Â June 30, 1994110%Â Â June 30, 1995115%Â Â June 30, 1996120%Â If any dependent is under the age of eighteen years at the time of the occurrence of the injury, the payment to such dependent shall cease when such dependent reaches the age of eighteen years except such payments shall continue until the dependent reaches age twenty-three while permanently enrolled at a full time course in an accredited school. The payment to any dependent shall cease if and when, under the same circumstances, the necessity creating the dependency would have ceased if the injury had not happened.(6) For claims filed prior to July 1, 1986, if the injured worker dies during the period of permanent total disability, whatever the cause of death, leaving a surviving spouse, or child, or children, the surviving spouse or child or children shall receive benefits as if death resulted from the injury as provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this section. Upon remarriage or death of such surviving spouse, the payments to such child or children shall be made as provided in subsection (2) of this section when the surviving spouse of a deceased worker remarries.(7) For claims filed on or after July 1, 1986, every worker who becomes eligible for permanent total disability benefits shall elect an option as provided in RCW 51.32.067.Sec. 467. RCW 51.32.185 and 2019 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) In the case of firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((17)))(14) (a), (b), (c), and (((h)))(e) or section 303(17) (a), (b), (c), and (h) of this act who are covered under this title and firefighters, including supervisors, employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis as a firefighter of a private sector employer's fire department that includes over fifty such firefighters, and public employee fire investigators, there shall exist a prima facie presumption that: (i) Respiratory disease; (ii) any heart problems, experienced within seventy-two hours of exposure to smoke, fumes, or toxic substances, or experienced within twenty-four hours of strenuous physical exertion due to firefighting activities; (iii) cancer; and (iv) infectious diseases are occupational diseases under RCW 51.08.140.(b) In the case of firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((17)))(14) (a), (b), (c), and (((h)))(e) or section 303(17) (a), (b), (c), and (h) of this act and firefighters, including supervisors, employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis as a firefighter of a private sector employer's fire department that includes over fifty such firefighters, and law enforcement officers as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((19)))(16) (b), (c), and (((e)))(d) or section 303(19) (b), (c), and (e) of this act, who are covered under this title, there shall exist a prima facie presumption that posttraumatic stress disorder is an occupational disease under RCW 51.08.140.(c) In the case of law enforcement officers as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((19)))(16) (b), (c), and (((e)))(d) or section 303(19) (b), (c), and (e) of this act who are covered under Title 51 RCW, there shall exist a prima facie presumption that: (i) Any heart problems, experienced within seventy-two hours of exposure to smoke, fumes, or toxic substances, or experienced within twenty-four hours of strenuous physical exertion in the line of duty; and (ii) infectious diseases are occupational diseases under RCW 51.08.140.(d) This presumption of occupational disease established in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence. Such evidence may include, but is not limited to, use of tobacco products, physical fitness and weight, lifestyle, hereditary factors, and exposure from other employment or nonemployment activities.(2) The presumptions established in subsection (1) of this section shall be extended to an applicable member following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each year of requisite service, but may not extend more than sixty months following the last date of employment.(3)(a) The presumption established in subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section shall only apply to any active or former firefighter or fire investigator who:(i) Has cancer that develops or manifests itself after the firefighter or fire investigator has served at least ten years; and(ii)(A) Was given a qualifying medical examination upon becoming a firefighter or fire investigator that showed no evidence of cancer; or(B)(I) For a firefighter or fire investigator who became a firefighter or fire investigator on or after July 28, 2019, the employer did not provide a qualifying medical examination upon becoming a firefighter or fire investigator; or(II) For a firefighter or fire investigator who became a firefighter or fire investigator before July 28, 2019, the employer did not provide a qualifying medical examination upon becoming a firefighter or fire investigator and the employer provides a qualifying medical examination on or before July 1, 2020. If a firefighter or fire investigator described in this subsection (3)(a)(ii)(B)(II) did not receive a qualifying medical examination before July 1, 2020, or is diagnosed with a cancer listed in (b) of this subsection at the time of the qualifying medical examination under this subsection (3)(a)(ii)(B)(II) and otherwise meets the requirements of this section, the presumption established in subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section applies.(b) The presumption established in subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section shall only apply to the following cancers: Prostate cancer diagnosed prior to the age of fifty, primary brain cancer, malignant melanoma, leukemia, non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, bladder cancer, ureter cancer, colorectal cancer, multiple myeloma, testicular cancer, kidney cancer, mesothelioma, stomach cancer, nonmelanoma skin cancer, breast cancer in women, and cervical cancer.(4) The presumption established in subsection (1)(a)(iv) and (c)(ii) of this section shall be extended to any firefighter, fire investigator, or law enforcement officer who has contracted any of the following infectious diseases: Human immunodeficiency virus/acquired immunodeficiency syndrome, all strains of hepatitis, meningococcal meningitis, or mycobacterium tuberculosis.(5) The presumption established in subsection (1)(b) of this section only applies to active or former firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((17)))(14) (a), (b), (c), and (((h)))(e) or section 303(17) (a), (b), (c), and (h) of this act and firefighters, including supervisors, employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis as a firefighter of a private sector employer's fire department that includes over fifty such firefighters, and law enforcement officers as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((19)))(16) (b), (c), and (((e)))(d) or section 303(19) (b), (c), and (e) of this act who have posttraumatic stress disorder that develops or manifests itself after the individual has served at least ten years.(6) If the employer does not provide the psychological exam as specified in RCW 51.08.142 and the employee otherwise meets the requirements for the presumption established in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the presumption applies.(7) Beginning July 1, 2003, this section does not apply to a firefighter, fire investigator, or law enforcement officer who develops a heart or lung condition and who is a regular user of tobacco products or who has a history of tobacco use. The department, using existing medical research, shall define in rule the extent of tobacco use that shall exclude a firefighter, fire investigator, or law enforcement officer from the provisions of this section.(8) For purposes of this section, "firefighting activities" means fire suppression, fire prevention, fire investigation, emergency medical services, rescue operations, hazardous materials response, aircraft rescue, and training and other assigned duties related to emergency response.(9)(a) When a determination involving the presumption established in this section is appealed to the board of industrial insurance appeals and the final decision allows the claim for benefits, the board of industrial insurance appeals shall order that all reasonable costs of the appeal, including attorney fees and witness fees, be paid to the firefighter, fire investigator, or law enforcement officer, or his or her beneficiary by the opposing party.(b) When a determination involving the presumption established in this section is appealed to any court and the final decision allows the claim for benefits, the court shall order that all reasonable costs of the appeal, including attorney fees and witness fees, be paid to the firefighter, fire investigator, or law enforcement officer, or his or her beneficiary by the opposing party.(c) When reasonable costs of the appeal must be paid by the department under this section in a state fund case, the costs shall be paid from the accident fund and charged to the costs of the claim.(10)(a) The director must create an advisory committee on occupational disease presumptions. The purposes of the advisory committee are to review scientific evidence and to make recommendations to the legislature on additional diseases or disorders for inclusion under this section.(b)(i) The advisory committee shall be composed of five voting members, appointed by the director as follows:(A) Two epidemiologists;(B) Two preventive medicine physicians; and(C) One industrial hygienist.(ii) The research director of the department's safety and health assessment and research for prevention program shall serve as the advisory committee nonvoting chair.(iii) Members serve for a term of four years and may be reappointed. Members shall not be compensated for their work on the advisory committee. As a condition of appointment, voting members and the chair must have no past or current financial or personal conflicts of interest related to the advisory committee activities. Voting members of the advisory committee may not be current employees of the department.(c) The chair or ranking member of the appropriate committee or committees of the legislature may initiate a request for the advisory committee to review scientific evidence and to make recommendations to the legislature on specific disorders or diseases, or specific occupations, for inclusion under this section by notifying the director.(d) The process of developing an advisory committee recommendation must include a thorough review of the scientific literature on the disease or disorder, relevant exposures, and strength of the association between the specific occupations and the disease or disorder proposed for inclusion in this section. The advisory committee must give consideration to the relevance, quality, and quantity of the literature and data. The advisory committee may consult nationally recognized experts or subject matter experts in developing its recommendations. The advisory committee must provide a recommendation to the legislature within the earlier of one hundred eighty days of the request or when the advisory committee reaches a consensus recommendation.(e) Each recommendation must include a written description of the scientific evidence and supporting information relied upon to assess the causal relationship between the occupation and health condition proposed for inclusion under this section. Estimates of the number of Washington workers at risk, the prevalence of the disease or disorder, and the medical treatment and disability costs should, if available, be included with the recommendation.(f) The recommendation must be made by a majority of advisory committee's voting members. Any member of the advisory committee may provide a written dissent as an appendix to the committee's recommendation.(g) The department's safety and health assessment and research for prevention program shall provide organizational and scientific support to the advisory committee. Scientific support must include for consideration of the advisory committee preliminary written reviews of the scientific literature on the disease and disorder, relevant exposures, and strength of the association between the specific occupations and the health condition or disorders proposed for inclusion in this section.Sec. 468. RCW 72.72.060 and 1983 c 279 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:The state shall reimburse cities and counties for their costs incurred under chapter 41.26 or 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW if the costs are the direct result of physical injuries sustained in the implementation of a contingency plan adopted under RCW 72.02.150 and if reimbursement is not precluded by the following provisions: If the secretary of corrections identifies in the contingency plan the prison walls or other perimeter of the secured area, then reimbursement will not be made unless the injuries occur within the walls or other perimeter of the secured area. If the secretary of corrections does not identify prison walls or other perimeter of the secured area, then reimbursement shall not be made unless the injuries result from providing assistance, requested by the secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee, which is beyond the description of the assistance contained in the contingency plan. In no case shall reimbursement be made when the injuries result from conduct which either is not requested by the secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee, or is in violation of orders by superiors of the local law enforcement agency.PART VMISCELLANEOUSSec. 501. RCW 41.45.010 and 2025 c 381 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:It is the intent of the legislature to provide a dependable and systematic process for funding the benefits provided to members and retirees of the public employees' retirement system, chapter 41.40 RCW; the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW; the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement systems, chapters 41.26 and 41.--- (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) RCW; the school employees' retirement system, chapter 41.35 RCW; the public safety employees' retirement system, chapter 41.37 RCW; and the Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter 43.43 RCW.The funding process established by this chapter is intended to achieve the following goals:(1) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2, and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 as provided by law;(2) ((To fully amortize the total costs of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, not later than June 30, 2024))To fund any unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system with a state contribution based on a systematic actuarial funding policy that would fully amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability over reasonable periods using reasonable assumptions and methods as determined by the state actuary;(3) To fully amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 within a rolling ten-year period, using methods and assumptions that balance needs for increased benefit security, decreased contribution rate volatility, and affordability of pension contribution rates, while suspending those rates during the 2025-2027 and 2027-2029 fiscal biennia;(4) To amortize the costs of benefit improvements in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 over a fixed 15-year period;(5) To establish long-term employer contribution rates which will remain a relatively predictable proportion of the future state budgets; and(6) To fund, to the extent feasible, all benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working lives of those members so that the cost of those benefits are paid by the taxpayers who receive the benefit of those members' service.Sec. 502. RCW 41.45.060 and 2025 c 381 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The state actuary shall provide preliminary actuarial valuation results based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035.(2) Not later than July 31, 2008, and every two years thereafter, consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes to:(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1;(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system; ((and))(c) Basic employer contribution rates for the school employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system for funding both those systems and the public employees' retirement system plan 1; and(d) If the state actuary determines an unfunded liability exists in the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, a state contribution for the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system based on a systematic actuarial funding policy that would fully amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability over reasonable periods using reasonable assumptions and methods as determined by the state actuary.The council may adopt annual ((rate changes))contributions for any plan for any rate-setting period. The ((contribution rates))contributions adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:(a) ((To fully amortize the total costs of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 not later than June 30, 2024;(b))) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2, and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section; and(((c)))(b) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 in accordance with RCW 41.45.070, 41.45.150, and this section.(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate a combined plan 2 and 3 normal cost, a Washington state patrol retirement system normal cost, and a public safety employees' retirement system normal cost.(5) A modified entry age normal cost method, as set forth in this chapter, shall be used to calculate employer contributions to the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1.(6) The employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system and the school employees' retirement system shall equal the sum of:(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3 normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(c) Except as described in (d) of this subsection, the amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed 15-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(d) The amounts required to fully amortize the remaining costs of benefit improvements in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 effective from July 1, 2018, through June 30, 2025, over a fixed 15-year period with the rate between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2029, being zero. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.(7) The employer contribution rate for the public safety employees' retirement system shall equal the sum of:(a) The amount required to pay the normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(c) Except as described in (d) of this subsection, the amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed 15-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(d) The amounts required to fully amortize the remaining costs of benefit improvements in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 effective from July 1, 2018, through June 30, 2025, over a fixed 15-year period with the rate between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2029, being zero. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.(8) The employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system shall equal the sum of:(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3 normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(c) Except as described in (d) of this subsection, the amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed 15-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(d) The amounts required to fully amortize the remaining costs of benefit improvements in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 effective from July 1, 2018, through June 30, 2025, over a fixed 15-year period with the rate between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2029, being zero. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.(9) The employer contribution rate for each of the institutions of higher education for the higher education supplemental retirement benefits must be sufficient to fund, as a level percentage of pay, a portion of the projected cost of the supplemental retirement benefits for the institution beginning in 2035, with the other portion supported on a pay-as-you-go basis, either as direct payments by each institution to retirees, or as contributions to the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund. Contributions must continue until the council determines that the institution for higher education supplemental retirement benefit liabilities are satisfied.(10) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the office of financial management and department of retirement systems of the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative modifications.(11) The director shall collect those rates adopted by the council. The rates established in RCW 41.45.062, or by the council, shall be subject to revision by the legislature.(12) The state actuary shall prepare final actuarial valuation results based on the economic assumptions, asset value smoothing technique, and contribution rates included in or adopted under RCW 41.45.030, 41.45.035, and this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 503. LEGISLATIVE DIRECTIVE.Sections 101 through 112 and 301 through 348 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 504. REPEALER.The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 41.26.005 (Provisions applicable to "plan 1" and "plan 2.") and 1992 c 72 s 2, 1991 c 35 s 12, 1989 c 273 s 10, 1985 c 102 s 5, 1979 ex.s. c 249 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 18;(2) RCW 41.26.035 ("Minimum medical and health standards" defined) and 1991 c 35 s 14 & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 2;(3) RCW 41.26.045 (Minimum medical and health standards) and 2012 c 117 s 40, 1979 ex.s. c 249 s 3, 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 20, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 8, & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 3;(4) RCW 41.26.046 (Minimum medical and health standardsâBoard to adoptâPublication and distributionâEmployer certification procedures) and 2012 c 117 s 41, 1987 c 418 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 21, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 12, 1972 ex.s. c 131 s 2, & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 4;(5) RCW 41.26.047 (Minimum medical and health standardsâExemptionsâEmployer may adopt higher standards) and 2012 c 117 s 42, 1972 ex.s. c 131 s 3, & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 5;(6) RCW 41.26.075 (Provisions applicable to plan 1) and 1992 c 72 s 3 & 1991 c 35 s 101;(7) RCW 41.26.080 (Funding total liability of plan 1 system) and 2007 c 492 s 8, 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 907, 1991 c 35 s 17, 1989 c 273 s 13, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 8;(8) RCW 41.26.090 (Retirement for service) and 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 4;(9) RCW 41.26.100 (Allowance on retirement for service) and 2006 c 350 s 1, 1991 c 343 s 16, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 3, 1972 ex.s. c 131 s 7, 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 9, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 5, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 10;(10) RCW 41.26.105 (Purchase of actuarially equivalent life annuity benefit upon retirementâPurchase by past retirees) and 2016 c 222 s 2;(11) RCW 41.26.110 (Disability boards authorizedâCompositionâTermsâReimbursement for travel expensesâDuties) and 2020 c 107 s 7;(12) RCW 41.26.115 (Director of retirement systems to adopt rules governing disability boardsâRemand of orders not in accordance with rules) and 1981 c 294 s 1;(13) RCW 41.26.120 (Retirement for disability incurred in the line of duty) and 1991 c 35 s 19, 1986 c 176 s 5, 1985 c 102 s 2, 1981 c 294 s 2, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 10, 1972 ex.s. c 131 s 8, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 7, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 12;(14) RCW 41.26.125 (Retirement for disability not incurred in the line of duty) and 1986 c 176 s 6 & 1985 c 102 s 3;(15) RCW 41.26.130 (Allowance on retirement for disability) and 1991 c 35 s 20, 1987 c 185 s 11, 1981 c 294 s 3, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 8, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 13;(16) RCW 41.26.135 (Cessation of disabilityâDetermination) and 1985 c 103 s 1;(17) RCW 41.26.140 (Reexaminations of disability beneficiariesâReentryâAppeal) and 1991 c 35 s 21, 1985 c 103 s 2, 1981 c 294 s 4, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 4, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 9, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 14;(18) RCW 41.26.150 (Sickness or disability benefitsâMedical services) and 2013 c 23 s 70, 1992 c 22 s 3, 1991 c 35 s 22, 1987 c 185 s 12, 1983 c 106 s 23, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 11, 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 10, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 10, 1969 ex.s. c 219 s 4, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 15;(19) RCW 41.26.160 (Death benefitsâDuty or military service connected) and 2009 c 226 s 1, 2005 c 62 s 1, 2002 c 158 s 1, 1999 c 134 s 2, & 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 5;(20) RCW 41.26.161 (Death benefitsâNonduty connected) and 2005 c 62 s 2, 2002 c 158 s 2, & 1999 c 134 s 3;(21) RCW 41.26.162 (Ex spouse qualifying as surviving spouse) and 2005 c 62 s 3, 2002 c 158 s 3, & 1991 sp.s. c 12 s 2;(22) RCW 41.26.164 (Optional reduced retirement allowanceâContinues for spouse otherwise ineligible for survivor benefits) and 2016 c 120 s 1, 2005 c 67 s 1, & 2002 c 158 s 4;(23) RCW 41.26.170 (Refund of contributions on discontinuance of serviceâReentry) and 1994 c 197 s 6, 1991 c 35 s 24, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 14, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 22;(24) RCW 41.26.190 (Credit for military service) and 1991 c 35 s 26, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 13, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 18;(25) RCW 41.26.192 (Credit for service under prior pension systemâRestoration of withdrawn contributions) and 1994 c 197 s 7 & 1992 c 157 s 1;(26) RCW 41.26.194 (Credit for service under prior pension systemâService not covered under prior system) and 1994 c 197 s 8 & 1992 c 157 s 2;(27) RCW 41.26.195 (Transfer of service credit from other retirement systemâIrrevocable election allowed) and 2010 c 260 s 1, 2007 c 492 s 9, 2003 c 294 s 2, & 1997 c 122 s 1;(28) RCW 41.26.197 (Service credit for paid leave of absenceâApplication to elected officials of labor organizations) and 1993 c 95 s 3;(29) RCW 41.26.199 (Purchase of additional service creditâCostsâRules) and 2006 c 214 s 5;(30) RCW 41.26.200 (Appeal to director of retirement systems) and 1981 c 294 s 5, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 6, 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 13, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 11, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 16;(31) RCW 41.26.211 (Notice for hearing required prior to petitioning for judicial review) and 1984 c 184 s 16, 1981 c 294 s 6, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 19;(32) RCW 41.26.221 (HearingâConduct) and 1984 c 184 s 17, 1981 c 294 s 7, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 20;(33) RCW 41.26.240 (Increases or decreases in retirement allowances to be determined by department in accordance with consumer price index) and 1991 c 35 s 27, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 13, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 16, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 24;(34) RCW 41.26.250 (Increase in presently payable benefits for service or disability authorized) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 178 s 3, 1974 ex.s. c 190 s 3, 1970 ex.s. c 37 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 34;(35) RCW 41.26.260 (Increase in certain presently payable death benefits authorized) and 1974 ex.s. c 190 s 4 & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 35;(36) RCW 41.26.270 (Declaration of policy respecting benefits for injury or deathâCivil actions abolished) and 1989 c 12 s 13, 1987 c 185 s 13, 1985 c 102 s 4, & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 14;(37) RCW 41.26.281 (Cause of action for injury or death, when) and 1991 c 35 s 28 & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 15;(38) RCW 41.26.291 (Lump sum defined benefitâPayable January 31, 2023) and 2022 c 168 s 1;(39) RCW 41.26.3901 (Severabilityâ1969 ex.s. c 209) and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 42;(40) RCW 41.26.3902 (Act to control inconsistencies) and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 43;(41) RCW 41.26.3903 (Effective dateâ1969 ex.s. c 209) and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 45; and(42) RCW 41.26.410 (Provisions applicable to plan 2) and 1991 c 35 s 29 & 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 2.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 505. SAVINGS.The repeals in section 504 of this act do not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the statutes repealed or under any rule or order adopted under those statutes nor do they affect any proceeding instituted under them. Rules adopted by the department of retirement systems relating to plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26 RCW shall continue in effect and apply to the restated law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 503 of this act) unless expressly inconsistent therewith and until repealed or superseded.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 506. NONSEVERABILITY.Sections 101 through 108 of this act are not severable, and if any provision of those sections is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire act is null and void.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 507. EFFECTIVE DATE.Except for sections 105, 108 through 112, and 462 of this act, this act takes effect June 30, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 508. Section 461 of this act expires July 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 509. Section 462 of this act takes effect July 1, 2030.--- END ---